TABLETALK

FROM LIGONIER MINISTRIES AND R. C. SPROUL | JANUARY 2018


FEARING GOD

---
Coram Deo Before the Face of God

The Fear of the Lord

by Burk Parsons

One of the most severe indictments the Apostle Paul ever leveled against humanity is that “there is no fear of God before their eyes” (Rom. 3:18). This statement has always been true of sinners who openly deny Christ, however, it is also increasingly true of many professing Christians. This is partly because many pastors not only avoid talking about the fear of God, but they also avoid talking about anything that would give people a reason to fear God. They avoid any mention of sin, hell, and condemnation. What’s more, they avoid all talk of the holiness, wrath, and sovereignty of God. This is happening not only in many mainline churches that abandoned the Word of God decades ago but also in churches that claim to affirm the historic confessions of the faith.

People don’t want a god of holiness and wrath, they only want a god of love and peace. They don’t want a god who hates their sin, they want a cuddly, teddy-bear god who’ll be their buddy. The reality is that people don’t want to fear God because they don’t want God in their lives. Some professing Christians don’t fear Him because they don’t actually know the God of Scripture, while they presume upon His grace to save them.

If we know the Lord, we fear the Lord, because He has put the fear of Himself into our hearts (Jer. 32:40). As Christians, we don’t have a servile, cowering, slave-like fear of the Lord. Rather, we have a filial, reverential, humble fear of the Lord. The gospel is the difference between being afraid of God and fearing God. It’s only when we come to fear the Lord that the Lord tells us to fear not. For when we know the love of God in Christ, the Spirit casts out all fear and instills in us love and adoration, that we might work out our salvation with fear and trembling and worship the Lord, Coram Deo, before His face, with reverence and awe.

BURK PARSONS is editor of Tabletalk magazine and serves as copastor of Saint Andrew’s Chapel in Sanford, Fla. He is editor of Assured by God: Living in the Fullness of God’s Grace. He is on Twitter @BurkParsons.

Tabletalk (usps 009-013) is published monthly by Ligonier Ministries, Inc., 421 Ligonier Ct, Sanford, FL 32771. Annual subscription price (12 issues): $23.00. Periodicals postage paid at Lake Mary, FL, and additional mailing offices. Postmaster: Send address changes to Ligonier Ministries, 421 Ligonier Ct, Sanford, FL 32771. Unless noted, all Scripture quotations are from The Holy Bible, English Standard Version. Copyright © 2001 by Crossway Bibles, a division of Good News Publishers. Used by permission. All rights reserved. Statement of Ownership, Management, and Circulation: Required by Title 39 United States Code 3685. Title of publication: Tabletalk. Publication no.: 009013. Date of filing: 10/1/17. Frequency of issue: monthly. No. of issues published annually: 12. Annual subscription price: $23/yr. usa; $33/yr. foreign. Location of known office of publication: 421 Ligonier Ct, Sanford, Seminole Co., FL 32771. Mailing address of headquarters: 421 Ligonier Ct, Sanford, FL 32771. Publisher: Ligonier Ministries. Executive Editor: R.C. Sproul. Owner: Ligonier Ministries, a nonprofit educational organization. Known bondholders, mortgagees, and other security holders owning or holding 1 percent or more of total amount of bonds, mortgages, or other securities: none. The purpose, function, and nonprofit status of this organization and the exempt status for federal income tax purposes has not changed during the preceding 12 months. Total no. of copies printed (net press run): average/last year: 100,913; last issue: 99,696. Paid/requested circulation: (1) Sales through dealers and carriers, street vendors, and counter sales: average/last year: 0; last issue: 0; (2) Mail subscription: average/last year: 75,493; last issue: 72,665. Free distribution by mail, carrier, or other means: average/last year: 7,777; last issue: 10,711. Total non-requested distribution: last year: 3,270; last issue: 2,495. Total distribution: average/last year: 96,545; last issue: 97,367. Copies not distributed: average/last year: 4,368; last issue: 2,329. Total: average/last year: 100,913; last issue: 99,696. I certify that the statements made by me above are correct and complete. —Burk Parsons, editor

---
TABLETALK

CONTENTS

FEARING GOD
JANUARY 2018 | VOL. 42 | NO. 1

FEATURES

What Are We Afraid Of?. . . . .6
Matt Smethurst

The God Whom We Are to Fear. . . . .14
K. Scott Oliphint

The Blessings of Fearing God. . . . .20
Kim Riddlebarger

Putting the Fear of God into Practice. . . . .24
Eric B. Watkins

STUDIES
                                        
Into the Word. . . . .33

Profitable for the Kingdom. . . . .39
Aaron L. Garriott

Your Words Reveal Your Heart. . . . .45
Steffen Mueller

The Idolatry of Sports. . . . .51
Jon D. Payne

Sanctified Culture. . . . .59
Rebecca VanDoodewaard
										  
COLUMNS										  

RIGHT NOW COUNTS FOREVER. . . . .4
God’s Good Pleasure in Election
R.C. Sproul

PASTOR'S PERSPECTIVE. . . . .30
Worship and the Fear of God
John P. Sartelle Jr.

HEART AFLAME. . . . .64
False Humility
John Blanchard

FOR THE CHURCH. . . . .66
Eating Together
David Camera

CITY ON A HILL. . . . .70
Good Works as a Light to the World
Jon Bloom
                                           
LAST THINGS. . . . .72
The Apocryphal and Deuterocanonical Books
Greg Salazar

---
RIGHT Now COUNTS Forever
God’s Good Pleasure in Election

by R.C. Sproul

IF WE ARE GOING TO TAKE THE Bible seriously, we have to have some doctrine of predestination. The idea of predestination wasn’t invented by Calvin or Luther or Augustine. Paul says in Ephesians 1:4-6 that in love, God “predestined us for adoption to himself as sons through Jesus Christ, according to the purpose of his will, to the praise of his glorious grace, with which he has blessed us in the Beloved.” So, predestination is a biblical word, and it’s a biblical concept.
But the very concept of predestination raises the question, why does God elect certain people and not others? We know that it’s not based on anything that we do. It’s not based on our running, our willing, or our doing anything. It’s based solely on the purpose of God, as Paul says in Ephesians. But that raises another question: If the reason for the Lord’s selecting some to receive the tremendous benefit of salvation but not others is not rooted in those whom He chooses (Rom. 9:1-18), doesn’t that mean that somehow God is arbitrary?
Let’s take a moment to define what we mean by the term arbitrary. People who are arbitrary do what they do without any reason. They just do it, and when you ask them why they did it, they might respond, “No reason. Just on a whim.” We don’t have a lot of respect for capricious people who do things for no reason. Now, are we going to attribute to God that kind of impetuous or motiveless behavior—that He is arbitrary and capricious? Scripture certainly won’t allow us to do that.
Here we must make a distinction between God’s doing something for no reason and His doing something for no reason found in us. We say clearly that His grace is given not for any reason in us. But the fact that there is no reason in me for my salvation does not mean there is no rea-son behind God’s action. Scripture actually tells us over and over again that God has a reason behind His choice of some for salvation and His not choosing others for redemption.
Ephesians 1:11 fleshes out the purpose behind predestination by telling us that predestination is “according to the purpose of him who works all things according to the counsel of his will.” The counsel of God’s will has to do with the wisdom, the plan, the thought processes of God. The very word “counsel” suggests intelligence and an intelligent reason for acting, and God never wills apart from His own counsel. A person who is completely arbitrary has no counsel, takes no counsel, listens to no counsel. He just does it. And so the very word “counsel” should alert us that the biblical idea here of God’s sovereign//pg. 4//grace is rooted in the wisdom of God, in His own thought, which is perfect. It’s not irrational—it’s eminently rational and far from arbitrary.
Another key word that is used again and again with respect to predestination and election in the Bible is the word “purpose.” We saw in Ephesians 1:4-6 that predestination is according to God’s purpose. Someone who does something arbitrarily does it for no purpose. But, the New Testament makes it clear that there is a divine purpose in God’s electing grace, and part of that is to make manifest the riches of His grace, to display His mercy (Rom. 9:22-24)— that is, to reveal some-thing about His marvelous character, which His grace certainly does. It makes manifest His awesome, marvelous, beautiful mercy. There’s also another purpose, and that’s the purpose of honoring Christ. Re-member the promise to Christ that He would see the travail of His soul and be satisfied (Isa. 53:11)? According to His own counsel, God determined from the foundation of the world that the cross of Jesus Christ would yield its appointed fruit and that Christ would be satisfied by the results of His pain, suffering, and death.
Notice that when the New Testament speaks of election and predestination, it always speaks of our being elect, or cho-sen, in the Beloved, in Christ. Ultimately, the New Testament tells us that people are chosen for salvation so that God the Father can bestow His glory, love, and affection on God the Son (Eph. 1:3-6). Ultimately, we’re redeemed not because of our worthiness but because of the worthiness of Christ. God is gracious to me in order to reward One who does deserve a reward—His only begotten Son. Do you see the intersection here of grace and justice? It is right or just that Christ should receive an inheritance, and we are that inheritance. That we are that inheritance is grace for us and justice for Christ.
The final thing I want to note is found in Ephesians 1:5. We are chosen “according to”—on the basis of—“the good pleasure” of God’s will (NKJV). God chooses and elects us according to what kind of pleasure? “Ac-cording to the good plea-sure of His will.” That word, “good,” makes all the difference in the world, because there’s no such thing as the bad pleasure of God’s will. God does not take plea-sure in evil, even if we take pleasure in evil. In fact, we sin because it’s so pleasurable to us. If it weren’t pleasurable, we wouldn’t be enticed to it or tempted by it. But there is no evil will in God. The only thing that has ever pleased God is goodness, the only pleasure that He’s ever had is a good pleasure, and the only purpose that He’s ever had is a good purpose.
Clearly, then, in the mystery of the grace of God, He is never whimsical, capricious, or arbitrary. Though the reason for our salvation does not rest in us, that does not mean that God is without a purpose in choosing His elect. He does have a purpose, and it is a good one. M
DR. R.C. SPROUL is copastor of Saint Andrew’s Chapel in Sanford, Fla,, and chancellor of Reformation Bible College. He is author of more than one hundred books, including Chosen by God.
(pg. 5)

---
WHAT ARE WE AFRAID OF?

BY MATT SMETHURST

It’s a multibillion-dollar industry. It fuels the Internet. It dominates political campaigns, talk radio, and the evening news. It sits on therapist couches and speaks on Facebook feeds. No respecter of persons, it steals sleep from feeble beggars and mighty kings.

What is this pervasive, inescapable, suffocating phenomenon?

Fear.

Human beings have always been scaredy-cats. That observation is not surprising. What is surprising is that even we—evolved “modem” people—are so scared.

On paper, we should have fewer fears than any generation before us. We’re surrounded by security systems, advanced medicine, organic food, and end-less information on a glowing rectangle in our pockets.

Yet we are deeply, miserably afraid. Far from loosening the choke hold of fear, the material blessings of our age seem only to have tightened it.

ILLUSION OF CONTROL
The achievements of modern life—medicinal, technological, and otherwise—have given us an ever-increasing sense of control. Actually, more than a sense. We really do enjoy more control over more aspects of life than ever before in history. We’re so accustomed to a convenient, custom-designed, there’s-an-app-for-that quality of life that we’re more shocked when things are hard than when they’re easy.

Without realizing it, this increasing sense of control can begin to feel natural, intuitive, right. Not a gift, mind you—a right. And we start to believe that if we can simply manage our fears, they will never master us.

We are wrong, and we are miserable.

But it’s even worse. Addicted to what we can control, we extend the borders of our kingdom into realms we can’t control. We try to control circumstances, but trials rudely show up uninvited. We try to control people, but they don’t stick to our wonderful plan for their lives. We try to control our future, but He who sits in the heavens always seems to laugh (Ps. 2:4).

FROM SCIENTISM TO SELFISM
In recent decades, as modernity has given birth to postmodernity, our culture’s reigning authorities have shifted, with the sovereignty of science bowing to the sovereignty of the self. Of course, the sovereign self isn’t a new actor on history’s stage; we’ve been climbing up God’s throne to topple Him ever since Genesis 3. Nevertheless, there is something genuinely new about our cultural moment in 2018. Fifty years ago, if you asked your unbelieving neighbor where to find truth, he likely would’ve pointed you to science. Ask the question today, and he’ll point you to you. Believe in yourself. Be true to yourself. Follow your heart. From doctoral seminars to Disney films, the religion of expressive individualism dominates the Western world. I don’t know if Rene Descartes (“I think, therefore I am”) would be proud, but DNA tests show that he’s the father of our individual emphases.

What does all this have to do with our fears? Much in every way, as Paul might say. If you really are “the master of your fate and the captain of your soul,” as the poem puts it, then everything is riding on you. Don’t crash.//pg. 7//
 
Not only do we have more stuff than ever—and therefore more than ever to lose—but we’ve promoted ourselves to a position for which we’re embarrassingly underqualified. The job description included omnicompetence, and we were arrogant enough to think we’d be a good fit. So we spend our days playing God, trying to fig-ure out the dials while steering the ship.

No wonder we’re paranoid.

STAND-ALONE GOD
So what is the answer to our dilemma? How can we disentangle ourselves from the fears that won’t leave
us alone? One answer is the doctrine of inerrancy. Yes, inerrancy. Simply put, if your Bible is not wholly true, then you should be terrified. Why? Because if your Bible is not wholly true, then you have no reason to trust that the One in charge of your life is both great and good.

I’m so grateful that my college campus minister, Dan Flynn, loved to emphasize these twin truths from Scripture. “God can and God cares,” he would say. I didn’t quite realize it at the time, but in those simple words he was distinguishing biblical Christianity from every religion on the market. Protestant liberalism, for example, offers a God who is good but not great. He cares, but He can’t. He’s a nice buddy, an experienced life coach, even a world-class psychotherapist, but ultimately He’s just “the man upstairs.” Meanwhile, other religions such as Islam offer the opposite: a God who is great but not entirely good. A God who can, but perhaps doesn’t care.

But when we open our Bibles, something unprecedented happens. It’s stunning, really. We encounter a living Lord who is both great and good, sovereign and kind, who can and who cares.

If God were only good, I would go to bed frightened. How could I worship someone who, bless His heart, means well and is doing His best? But I would likewise go to bed frightened if He were only sovereign. What assurance is there in knowing He’s mighty if He’s not merciful? What comfort is there in a deity who doesn’t care about us?

RIVAL FEARS
Most of our anxieties are species of one great fear: the fear of man. We’re terrified of being rejected, embarrassed, finally exposed for who we really are. In his 2005 commencement address at Kenyon College, the late American novelist David Foster Wallace captured this universal, even primal, human dynamic. Wallace was not a Christian, and yet his words struck a profound spiritual chord:

*The compelling reason for maybe choosing some sort of God or spiritual-type thing to worship ...is that pretty much anything else you worship will eat you alive. If you worship money and things, if they are where you tap real meaning in life, then you will never feel you have enough. Worship your body and beauty and sexual allure and you will always feel ugly, and when time and age start showing, you will die a million deaths before they finally grieve you. Worship power, and you will end up feeling weak and afraid, and you will need evermore power over others to numb you to your//pg. 8//own fear. Worship your intellect, and you will end up feeling like a fraud, always on the verge of being found out. But the insidious thing about these forms of worship is... they’re unconscious. They are default settings.

Paralyzing fears over poverty and aging and weakness and exposure and count-less other threats are due, ultimately, to disordered doxology. Our worship is mis-placed. Rather than enjoying God in His rightful place—the sun around which everything in life orbits—we have dislodged Him and replaced Him
with a mirror. Without Him as our gravitational center, everything spins off in a thousand directions. Such is the insanity of idolatry. No wonder life feels so chaotic, so exhausting.

According to the Scriptures, we fear man so much because we fear God so little. Fearing the Lord is the ultimate key to understanding (Prov. 1:7) and the antidote to anxiety.

To be clear, we don’t fear Him because He’s mean but because He is holy. He’s not a dictator or traffic cop in the sky; He’s the Lord of love. He is beautiful. As the Puritan John Flavel observed, “Godly fear does not arise from a perception of God as hazardous, but glorious.” The One who made us and saved us is worth our esteem, our reverence, our awe. And the counterintuitive beauty of grace is that His forgiveness woos us into even greater fear(Ps. 130:4).

THE LORD AND THE LAMB
In Luke 12, Jesus exhorts His disciples not to be anxious, since their Father in heaven is both infinitely great and perfectly good. Then He makes one of the most beautiful statements in all the Gospels: ‘Fear not, little flock, for it is your Father’s good pleasure to give you the kingdom” (v. 32).

Shepherd. Father. King. Three massive truths shrink-wrapped in one verse. The God we meet on the pages of Scripture— and only that God—is the Shepherd who seeks us, the Father who adopts us, and the King who loves us.

And two thousand years ago, in the Lord Jesus Christ, the Shepherd King became the Lamb slain. As comforting as it is, then, to hear “The Lord is my shepherd” (Ps. 23:1), there’s something even better: the Lamb is my Shepherd (Rev. 7:17). The One who craft-ed you in His image is the One who pursued you, lived for you, died for you, rose for you, intercedes for you, and will return for you if you’re resting in Him.

UNBROKEN STREAK
Do you know what’s the most repeated command in the Bible? “Fear not.” I imagine that’s because God knew we would need constant reminding—yes, even we twenty-first-century modems with smartphones in our pockets.

Human history is the long story of God’s unbroken faithfulness to scaredy-cats. He has never failed one of His own. Don’t be so arrogant as to think that He might some-how end His streak with you. He won’t. Has He not been faithful to you over the course of ten thousand yesterdays? You can trust Him for tomorrow.

And as you look to Jesus Christ, the au-thor and perfecter of your faith, don’t forget to listen. You just might hear your chains of fear start to crack.

MATT SMETHURST is managing editor of The Gospel Coalition. He is on Twitter at @MattSmethurst.

(pg. 9)

---
THE GOD WHOM WE ARE TO FRAR

BY K. SCOTT OLIPHINT  

This past August, for the first time since 1979, North America, and other parts of the world, were treated to a total solar eclipse. Its totality could be viewed by a limited number of people, depending on their location. The fact of its occurrence was announced on television, radio and other media, and the event was anticipated by millions. Some traveled thousands of miles just to get a “total” view of this rare event.

One of the things that was stressed over and over again as the eclipse was anticipated was the harm that could be caused if the human eye was exposed directly, and for too long, to such a phenomenon. But why would an eclipse of the sun harm the eye? We’re all aware of the harmful effects of staring at the sun when it is bright and full. What’s the harm in staring when its effects are darkened, even totally darkened?

When we look at the sun in its fullness, our eyes naturally squint and we almost immediately look away due to its brightness. In an eclipse, that brightness is momentarily covered. The problem, however, is that the ultraviolet rays that can damage our eyes are not diminished in an eclipse. Because we need not squint during an eclipse, those rays can pour in and thus produce more damage than when the full light of the sun forces us to squint and look away. An eclipse, in other words, though it covers over the sun’s luster and overpowering luminosity, does not minimize or cover up the sun’s power to harm us. Whether “eclipsed” or not, it is the same sun, and it has the same power.

There is a fascinating interchange between God and Moses in Exodus 33 and 34. As the Lord commissions Moses to lead His people into the Promised Land, He descends in a cloud to the tent of meeting, and Moses speaks with the Lord there “face to face” (Ex. 33:11). He tells Moses that he has found favor in His sight and that He knows Moses by name (v. 17). Clearly, this is an affirmation, because of God’s grace to Moses, of the close fellowship that Moses has with God. The language the Lord uses is language of an intimate relationship. It is God’s unswerving commitment to His chosen servant, Moses. Moses is so taken with God’s affirmation of this relationship that he, almost impulsively it seems, says to the Lord, “Please show me your glory” (v. 18).

Why would Moses make this request? What, exactly, is he asking?

The motive of Moses is not in question here. His thinking is something like this: “Lord, if it is true that I have found favor in Your sight, and if You truly do know me by name, increase our fellowship together with a fuller expression of Your glorious character. I want to see Your glory in its fullest manifestation.” What he wants is a fuller manifestation of all that he has seen up to this point.

Moses has already seen the external glory of God. He saw it in the cloud descending (16:10); he saw it on Mount Sinai (24:16). He saw it in the very face of God (33:11). But all of these “sightings” of God’s glory were, like a solar eclipse,//pg. 15//hiding the fullness of God’s glory. They were true and majestic manifestations of who God is, but they were not, because they could not be, manifestations of God’s glory in its fullness.

The Lord knows that Moses’ request is impossible to fulfill. He does not rebuke Moses for the request, but He makes clear to him what would happen if He were to do what Moses has requested: He says to Moses, “If you were to see My glory, Moses, you would immediately die!” This statement from the Lord to Moses gives us a clue as to why we are to fear God. We are to fear God because we understand that to see His glory would mean certain death.

But why would seeing the glory of God mean death for us? What is it about the fullness of God’s glory that would destroy us? It is simply this: The glory of God in its fullest expression is the totality of everything that God is. And the sight of everything that God is would overpower us to the point of death.

This fullness of God’s glory, for ex-ample, is His infinity. God cannot be measured in any way because He has no boundaries. We cannot picture in our minds, much less lay our eyes on, that which is infinite. God’s infinity should provoke awe and wonder and fear in us because it is so utterly foreign to everything that we are as creatures. The same is true for God’s eternity. Eternal life for the Christian means our lives, in Christ, will never end. But God’s eternity is not like that. God’s eternity means He always lives, but without His life being subject to the passing of time. God, and He alone, simply is. As with infinity, if we try to picture eternity in our minds, we fail. His eternal glory moves us to praise Him, and it moves us to fear Him because it utterly transcends our limit-ed, creaturely existence.

When Scripture says that God dwells in “unapproachable light” (1 Tim. 6:16), it means that God’s characteristics of infinity, power, eternity, etc., are beyond the creature’s ability to take in. We cannot approach the light of His glorious character because it is infinitely and eternally beyond anything we are or will ever be. We fear Him for the same reason that we praise Him. We fear Him because of who He is in His infinite, eternal power and majesty.

The fullness of the glory of God is His alone; it is for His eyes only. It cannot be seen by mortal man. So great and majestic and transcendent is this glory that if it were revealed to us in its fullness, it would immediately snuff out our finite and creaturely existence.

How, then, can we know God if the fullness of His character and glory cannot be seen by us? We know God the way Moses knew God. We know God as He reveals that glory to us, on our level, in a way that will not overwhelm and destroy us. We know God because, as Calvin reminds us, He has “stooped” to our level to make Himself known. He “stooped” to the request of Moses by let-ting Moses see His back (Ex. 33:23). He//pg. 16//“stooped” in the Old Testament as He spoke to our fathers by the prophets, at many times and in many ways. Climactically, He “stooped” when He spoke to us by His Son, who Himself is like us, even as He remains the very radiance of the glory of God and the exact imprint of His nature (Heb. 1:1-3).

But herein lies “the rub” for many. The “stooping” of God—what we call in theology God’s conventional condescension—can sometimes lull us into thinking that God is just like us. This, un-fortunately, became the mindset of many in Israel (Ps. 50:21). Because God extends His glorious grace to us by coming down to our level, we might begin to convince ourselves that the condescended revelation of God to us is all that there is to God. We might think that it is no trouble for us to view the full glory and character of God. We might fool ourselves into thinking that the unapproachable Light can, as a matter of fact, be seen and grasped by us all. We might act as though God is not to be feared after all.

But, as with a total eclipse, this “veiling” of the fullness of God’s infinite and eternal character in His divine stooping to us in no way minimizes the power of that character. Though God graciously veils the fullness of His glory in His revelation to us, He is, and always remains, the God whose very character could destroy us with one glimpse. That is part and parcel of what it means for God to be God. The “eclipse” of God’s glory in the condescended revelation of that glory should never cause us to think we are able to see God in His fullness. We see God only because He has condescended to our level. But even as condescended, He continues to dwell in unapproachable light. The unapproachable light of God’s glory, though “eclipsed” in His revelation, is ever present in that revelation and its power is never diminished. It is that light—the full effulgence of His glory—that should always cause us rightly to fear Him.

Christians need not fear God because they fear eternal punishment; Christ has taken that fear away. We need not fear God because we fear He will go back on His promises or will, in the end, not accept us. Christians fear God, in the first place, because we recognize that the radiance of His infinite, eternal, and majestic character would, simply by its majesty, stamp us out of existence. We fear God because we know that if we were to see Him in all His glory, we would be no more. And then we approach Him with reverence and awe because we know that such an approach “fearfully” acknowledges the One who is, in His condescension, revealed to us, but who also infinitely, eternally, and immutably continues to shine with a brightness that no human could endure. God is to be feared be-cause of who He is in the fullness of His majestic being.

DR. K. SCOTT OLIPHINT is professor of apologetics and systematic theology at Westminster Theological Seminary in Philadelphia, an ordained minister in the Orthodox Presbyterian Church, and author of several books, including The Battle Belongs to the Lord.

(pg. 17)

---
THE BLESSINGS OF FEARING GOD

BY KIM RIDDLEBARGER

I was still a young man, but I vividly remember the preacher’s words. “When the Bible speaks of the fear of the Lord, it does not mean to be
afraid of God, but to respect Him. We must never be afraid of God, because He loves us.” The preacher had a point. But later I wondered, how does the softening of “fear” into “respect” square with the well-known declaration in Proverbs 1:7: “The fear of the Lord is the beginning of knowledge, something which fools despise”? So, what does it mean to fear the Lord? How is such fear related to God’s love for lost and fallen sinners? How can “fear” of the Lord secure blessings for God’s people?

It is important to settle the critical point from the outset. The “fear” (Hebrew yireh) of the Lord means exactly what I thought it did—to be afraid, terrified, or in awe. There is no justification for understanding “fear” as mere respect. The word “fear” appears frequently throughout the Old Testament, often connected to wisdom as its source. Wisdom, in turn, is found in knowing who God is—witnessing His awesome power, coming to grips with His holy and righteous judgments, as well as understanding that He brings all things unto the ends for which He has appointed them. In this sense, the fear of the Lord is the beginning of wisdom. Fools, on the other hand, seek to ignore God who reveals Himself as a “consuming fire” through His Word and in His deeds (Heb. 12:29). If wisdom arises from fear of the Lord, the height of foolishness is to pretend that God, who is all-powerful, holy, and sovereign, does not exist.

Understood biblically, the fear of God is not an abstract theological speculation resulting from observing natural phenomena such as lightning or earthquakes. From the time of Abraham until Israel’s exodus from Egypt and the conquest of Canaan, God’s people repeatedly witnessed God’s supernatural power over nature. This is especially the case in the way in which God brought judgment upon His enemies—the fate of the elite Egyptian chariot units in the waters of the Red Sea comes to mind. The people of Israel also witnessed God’s awesome presence with His people as they made their way from Egypt into the promised land of Canaan (for example, the pillar of fire by night and the cloud by day). Joshua recounts how the people of Jericho were terrified once they became aware that the Lord was leading His people Israel in their direction (Josh. 2:10-11). God is to be feared because of who He is.

But how do we resolve the apparent discrepancy between a God who is to be feared and a God who the Scriptures also tell us “is love” (1 John 4:8)? What the preacher of my childhood missed was the fact that we need not weaken the force of the biblical affirmation that God is to be feared in order to preserve the fact that God is love. There is a biblical way to solve the conundrum that preserves both biblical points. The solution is a proper understanding of the biblical covenants.

God is to be feared because we have all rebelled against Him. We are all guilty before Him because of our sins—guilty for Adam’s sin imputed to us, as well as guilty for our actual sins (Gen. 3). When our first parents sinned in Eden, they were then terrified by the Lord’s approach. The reason for their terror? God is perfectly//pg. 21//and absolutely holy. Adam and Eve were once innocent. After the fall, however, the rebels were cast from Eden because they were guilty. From that moment until now, we have had to fear God because He is holy, we are sinners, and all human sin must be punished.

Yet the Scriptures also teach that God was present with His people immediately after Adam’s fall. God’s presence was one of the blessings of the gracious covenant God promised to Adam (Gen.3:r 5) and then later ratified with God’s call of Abraham (12; 15; 17; 22:1-19). Abraham was told that he would be the father of a great nation with countless descendants who would become as numerous as the stars in heaven. This people (Israel) would become a great nation, possessing the Land of Promise between the Nile and the Euphrates rivers. All the members of this covenant are beneficiaries of God’s gracious promise to save His people from the guilt of their sin—alleviating their fear that they would receive the same judgments that they had seen fall on God’s enemies.

Abraham’s children later sojourned in Egypt, only to find themselves, generations later, slaves of Pharaoh. Upon Israel’s exodus from Egypt and entrance into the Sinai wilderness, God directed His people to the foot of Mount Sinai, where He made an additional covenant with Israel (the Sinaitic or Mosaic covenant). Reflecting elements of His original covenant with Adam (commandments are given) as well as His gracious covenant with Abraham (God reckons His people righteous through faith in His covenant promise), the Sinai covenant promised Israel blessings for obedience to His commandments and also threatened curses for disobedience.

This brief synopsis reminds us that the story of redemption is that of an all-powerful, holy, and sovereign God who is to be feared and who graciously calls to Himself a people through whom the promises made to Abraham will be fulfilled. Assembled on the plains of Moab and about to enter the Promised Land of Canaan (Deut. 28:1-14), the people of Israel are reminded by Moses, in a remarkable scene, of the blessings promised them through obedience to the Lord’s covenant, as well as threats of what will happen if the people of Israel cease to fear God, no longer trust in His gracious promise to deliver them from their sins, and instead seek the false gods of their soon-to-be Canaanite neighbors.

Under the terms of this covenant, there were material blessings promised (long life, material prosperity, protection from enemies) as well as spiritual blessings. The material blessings of Canaan are tangible pictures of invisible spiritual realities of which we cannot yet conceive—eternal life in the presence of God. The psalmist can say of God’s people under the terms of this covenant, “Blessed is the man who fears the Lord, who greatly delights in his commandments! His offspring will be mighty in the land; the generation of the upright will be blessed” (Ps. 112:1-2). Those who fear God (acknowledge that He is all-powerful, holy, and sovereign)//pg. 22//and also believe His promise to deliver them from His wrath (trust in a coming Messiah) will be blessed. God has so promised.

With the coming of Jesus Christ, God’s people can properly understand how wonderful blessings arise from the fear of God. As Christians who are members of the new covenant (foretold by Jer. 31:31-34 to supersede the old covenant), we know that our inability to obey His commandments once condemned us.
Now these same commandments are written upon our hearts. There is a full and final forgiveness of sin. We who once were God’s enemies are now His friends (Rom. 5:1-10). With grateful hearts, we now desire to obey God’s commandments, and we will receive the blessings promised to us when we do so. There are promises of a long life (Prov. 10:27; Eph. 6:2-3), answered prayer (James 5:16), peace with civil authorities (Rom. 13:1-7), and even deliverance from heresy and Satanic deception (1 John 2:18-25).

God’s commandments reflect His intrinsic holiness. Our inability to obey His commands reminds us of why the holy God is to be feared. We know the biblical record. We have read of God pouring out His wrath and fury upon His enemies in the days of Noah (the flood) and in the plagues sent upon Egypt. We have read of a final judgment yet to come (Rev. 6:12-17). But we also read of God pouring out His wrath upon Jesus Christ, sparing us from the wrath that is to come. In this moment, Paul tells us, the love and justice of God meet (Rom. 3:21-29).

At the foot of the cross of Jesus Christ, we find the answers to our original questions about the “fear of the Lord.” Yes, God is to be feared—not just respected—even by a Christian who trusts in Jesus Christ. God is holy, righteous, and powerful. But we are sinful, we deserve His wrath, and we are weak and frail. Were it not for the cross, we too would be consumed by the wrath of God and would receive all the threatened curses. The very thought of life apart from Christ’s cross stirs fear, terror, and awe. Since God is love, in the God-man Christ Jesus He took our sins upon Himself, re-moving them from us as far as the east is from the west. While we fear God because of who He is, we need never fear His approach because His wrath and anger toward us have been turned aside at Calvary.

The fear of the Lord remains, then, a great source of blessing. Knowing that Jesus was punished for my sins in my place reminds me both that God is to be feared (He takes sin seriously) and yet is love (of which the cross is the sign). Now that my sins are washed away, I can obey God, knowing that He is pleased with my pitiful efforts because I am accepted in the person and work of His Son. This is how all His promised blessings become mine—because I fear the Lord having found forgiveness through the cross of Jesus Christ.

DR. KIM RIDDLEBARGER is senior pastor of Christ Reformed Church in Anaheim, Calif, and a cohost of the White Horse Inn radio program. He is author of several books, including A Case for Amillennialism and First Corinthians in the Lectio Continua series.

(pg. 23)

---
PUTTING THE FEAR OF GOD INTO PRACTICE

BY ERIC B. WATKINS

Few topics are more challenging to think about than the fear of God. Pride and the constant temptation to make God conform to our ideas of what He ought to be like tempt us to abandon concepts that Scripture plainly teaches. The culture in which we live reinforces these distorted perceptions of who God is and how He relates to us. The particular idea of fearing God is virtually lost in our culture, not just outside the church but, in many respects, within it as well.

Historically, one of the important uses of the law of God was to restrain evil in a general sense by cultivating a healthy fear of God and the consequences of our actions. Yet our society has lost even the most basic fear of God that would otherwise restrain evil acts. Unfettered by a healthy fear of God, everyone does what is right in his own eyes, and thus, close on the heels of this moral anarchy is the breakdown of society itself.

For instance, gone are the days when people took oaths in court, swearing to tell “the truth, the whole truth, and nothing but the truth, so help me God” with a holy fear of God's just judgment if they should lie. Without the fear of God in our legal system, is it any wonder that nearly everyone balks at ideas such as justice? Yet where there is no justice, there is also no peace, and anarchy always follows.

Inside the church, the fear of God has become for many an archaic sentiment of the past. Preachers who continue to insist that God is to be feared are labeled either as legalistic Bible-thumpers or as “hellfire-damnation” preachers. Certainly, the idea of the fear of God can be stated in ways that create a culture of fear, and pulpits can regrettably become places where the grace of the gospel is supplanted by threats and manipulation. But is there no place for a proper, healthy fear of God in the Christian life?

A recent popular movement among evangelicals has suggested that the idea of the love of God is so strong in Scripture that any sense of fearing God is a mark of spiritual immaturity. To fear God, according to this movement, suggests that we do not really understand who God is and the love God has for us in Christ. In this view, “love wins.” And since God is all-loving, not only should Christians not fear God anymore, but God is apparently too loving to send anyone to hell. This view, which has descended into universalism (which suggests that everyone goes to heaven because God is so full of love that He would not condemn anyone), has become a cancerous blight upon the face of evangelicalism. Barely recognizable is the justice of God and His redemptive plan to rescue a blood-bought bride out of this sin-stained world and deliver her safely into the bliss of everlasting life and communion with God.

However, to say that God does this for the whole world is a violent twisting of Scripture and a denial of the doctrines of judgment and a literal hell. Some of the old Puritans used to say that “the foundation of God's throne is justice.” Any denial of the justice of God and even eternal damnation makes our salvation cheap, and it turns God ultimately into a toothless tiger.//pg. 25//

While the movement described above is certainly a fringe movement and ultimately a Christianity falsely-so-called, it is still arguable that even Christians who reject universalism either have virtually no fear of God, or they simply don’t understand where the idea of the fear of God fits into the Christian life. None of us wants to be a legalist, and after all, “God is love.” But does that mean that the fear of God has no place in our Christianity? A brief survey of the idea in Scripture suggests the very opposite: that a healthy and properly understood fear of God is not only endorsed by Scripture, but it is healthy, it is beautiful, and it leads to a Christian life that is full of joyful obedience and service.

Very familiar to many of us is Proverbs 1:7, which says, “The fear of the Lord is the beginning of knowledge, but fools despise wisdom and instruction.” I love the Proverbs and try each day to read the chapter that corresponds to the day of the month (the book has thirty-one chapters, which make it a great way to begin devotional reading). Over the years, the book of Proverbs has been very helpful, challenging, and encouraging. As a young man, I found the book of Proverbs to be like listening to the voice of a wise, godly father instructing his son in how to live a life that is pleasing to God. The world is filled with temptations and folly, and the book of Proverbs is like a map that safely leads us around the dangerous shoals upon which we can so easily crash. But what would the book of Proverbs be without the notion of the fear of God? Oft repeated in the book of Proverbs is the idea of the “fear of the Lord” (2:5; 3:7; 9:10; 10:27; and many other places). The phrase is used sixteen times and helps the one who fears God to find wisdom, hate evil, prolong life, and enjoy satisfaction, honor, and safety. Without the fear of God, the young listener to the book of Proverbs falls into many traps, is lured away by evil, is seduced by the desires of the flesh, and ends up destroyed by a lack of wisdom. In short, without the fear of God, our path is one that leads us away from God and to destruction. To fear God in the book of Proverbs is to pursue life, peace, and joy in the sight of God.

Some have wondered if the idea of fearing God is narrowly an Old Testament idea. This view is not new; it joins hands with those who have suggested that the God of the Old Testament is full of wrath and anger, but the God of the New Testament is full of love and peace. Such a dualism between who God was in the Old Testament and who He is in the New Testament is unbiblical and unhealthy. One clear example of this is the fact that God promised in the Old Testament that in the new covenant era, He would put the fear of Him into the hearts of His people (not just His enemies). Through the prophet Jeremiah, God said, “I will make with them an everlasting covenant, that I will not turn away from doing good to them. And I will put the fear of me in their hearts, that they may not turn from me” (Jer. 32:40). That promise is clearly fulfilled in Christ in the new covenant. As God has made Himself our God and redeems us to be His people, He calls us, like the son in Proverbs, to walk in the fear of God.

This is perfectly embodied in Jesus, of course. Jesus is the perfect, Proverbs-keeping Son who not only shuns evil but walks in the fear of God. Everything the Proverbs command a young man to do, Jesus perfectly did (including cultivating a proper fear of God). Everything the Proverbs commands a young man not to do, Jesus resisted with all His heart. Jesus is the perfect Son, and as such, He is the only one capable of delivering us from our sins and imperfections and ultimately the fear of hell. The Bible is strikingly clear that Christ has undergone judgment on our behalf in such away that the believer has been declared righteous in//pg. 26//the sight of God not through anything that we can do but through the righteousness of Christ (Gal. 2:21). The Christian, being united to Christ, cannot lose his salvation (Col. 3 3). He presently has eternal life, for he has passed from death to life and shall not come into judgment (John 5:24). In Christ, our hope of eternal life in heaven is secure and cannot be taken away. This is one of the sweetest and most important comforts of the Christian life: that we belong to Christ and thus heaven belongs to us. Apart from Christ, we have no hope whatsoever, but in Christ, our hope is blissfully secure.

This is the point made by 1 John 4:18, a verse that is often used to suggest that there is no longer any place for the fear of God in the Christian life. The verse says, “There is no fear in love, but perfect love casts out fear.” Taken out of context, the verse might seem to suggest that the Christian ought not to have any fear of God as a result of God’s love. Seeing the verse in context, however, clarifies the issue:

*By this is love perfected with us, so that we may have confidence for the day of judgment, because as he is so also are we in this world. There is no fear in love, but perfect love casts out fear. For fear has to do with punishment, and whoever fears has not been perfected in love. (1 John 4:17-18)*

It seems clear that the “fear” John is de-scribing here has to do with the “punishment” on the “day of judgment” awaiting those who are liars and do not actually have the love of God within them. John’s goal through this book is not only to challenge his readers pastorally but also to comfort them in their assurance of salvation based on their adoption into the family of God through their union with Christ. For those who belong to Christ, in whom the love of God abides, there is no fear of the day of judgment because Jesus, the Son of God, was sent to be the “propitiation for our sins” (v. 10). Since we have this confidence in Christ, our fear of the day of judgment is gone, but that does not mean there is no remaining sense in which a Christian ought to fear God. It is to this proper sense of fearing God that we now turn.

Building on the redemptive promises of God, Paul urges the church in Corinth to continue pursuing holiness in the context of fearing God He does this beautifully in 2 Corinthians 7:1, which says, “Since we have these promises, beloved, let us cleanse ourselves from every defilement of body and spirit, bringing holiness to completion in the fear of God.” Paul is expounding upon the language of Leviticus and its call to God’s people to be separated from the world and to live holy lives, viewing their own bodies as the temple of the living God. Both our bodies and souls belong to God, and they are to be separated from the world for the purposes of holy living. That is what it means to “cleanse ourselves from every defilement of body and spirit.” Paul and the New Testament do not view holiness as something that has been completed in the life of the believer, but rather as something that is ongoing—a work in progress. In fact, Paul urges us to “bring holiness to completion in the fear of God.” This language likely echoes the ministry of the old covenant priests, who were to//pg. 28//pursue the holiness of God with humility and devotion. In like manner, believers live their lives coram /Ao (before the face of God), and as priests ministering in the presence of God, we ought to conduct our business before Him with a measure of fear that reminds us of the One in whose presence we live and serve. Christians, in a certain sense, are priests in service to the living God, and both our bodies and souls should be regarded as holy unto the Lord and set apart for the service of God. Rather than living out of a callous indifference or shallow sense of service, we are called to humble ourselves in the sight of God, lift up His name, and do everything we can to glorify and enjoy Him in our endeavors.

No reflection on the topic of the fear of God would be complete without at least a brief reflection on the language of adoption. Nothing reconciles the perceived ten-sion between loving and fearing God better than adoption, as the bond between God and the believer is tenderly illustrated in the analogy of a father and a son. I should admit that I am particularly fond of the adoption metaphor in Scripture. I have three adopted children—two sons and a daughter. Occasionally, the older two will ask my wife and me why we adopted them (they each came from very broken situations). Our answer is simple and consistent: we adopted them because we love them. I often tell people that there is nothing in the world better than being a dad. I love being a pastor; I feel awkward when people call me “doctor”; but when my kids say the word “dad, ” I feel as light as a feather and as happy as I can be. It’s truly beautiful.

But that does not mean that my kids should not have a proper fear of me. In fact, they often do. They know there are rules in the house. They know the face of my pleasure and the face of my displeasure. They know the sound of my voice when I call to them in joy and when I call to them in frustration. They also know that no matter what they do, I will never un-adopt them. Their identity is secure. They are my kids, and I will always love them. But there are times when the gravitas of what it means for me to be dad and for them to be children should inform their behavior and decisions.

If these qualities are appropriate in our earthly relationships, how much more should they be in our relationship with God? Love and fear, properly understood, are not antithetical; they are complementary. There is no true love of God without a proper fear of God. Christians who do not fear God live in a state of anarchy and uncertainty; they neither truly know God nor truly know themselves. Yet just as mercy and justice sweetly kiss at the cross, so do love and fear sweetly comply in the context of a healthy Christian life. God is the perfect Father—full of justice and full of love. His love does not suppress His justice; it fulfills it.

Practicing the fear of God in a relativistic world is a joyful privilege as well as a humbling challenge. The world around us, and at times even other Christians, so diminishes the attributes of God that our perception of God is easily distorted. A distorted view of God will inevitably lead to a distorted view of the Christian life. We all think too much of ourselves and too little of God, and at times, even the good things that we do are driven by self-serving goals. That prideful sense of self-centeredness is reined in by the fear of God and leads to walking with Him in wisdom and righteousness. To love God as Father includes a healthy fear of Him that keeps us humble and causes us to strive to bring holiness to completion in the fear of God.

DR. ERIC B. WATKINS is senior pastor of Covenant Presbyterian Church (OPC) in St. Augustine, Fla. He is author of The Drama of Preaching: Participating with God in the History of Redemption.

(pg. 29)

---
PASTOR'S PERSPECTIVE

Worship and the Fear of God

JOHN P. SARTELLE SR.

In the scriptures, we are commanded to love God. In the same Scriptures, we are commanded with similar emphasis to fear God. I did not find this difficult to understand. In our home, I was taught to love my father. He was a reserved and quiet man, but even in my teenage years, when it seemed “uncool,” he would hug me and kiss me on the cheek. I knew I was loved, and I responded with love.

In that same home I was taught to fear my father. This was not a morbid terror; it was a fear that reflected a reverential awe. He was beyond me in position. He was my father and I was not his equal in position. I was under his authority and dependent upon his provision. He was beyond me in knowledge and wisdom. He was beyond me in the eyes of the world. In the eyes of the world, I had to have his permission to be engaged in certain activities. In a limited way, he was the first transcendent person in my life.

So, for me, there was no conflict between loving him and fearing him. My reverence of him was evident in every part of our relationship. The way I addressed him, the way I obeyed him, the way I sought his counsel and his will demonstrated a very real respect.

Considering this subject, I have always been fascinated by the scene depicted in Isaiah 6:1-3:

*In the year that King Uzziah died I saw the Lord sitting upon a throne, high and lifted up; and the train of his robe filled the temple. Above him stood the seraphim. Each had six wings: with two he covered his face, and with two he covered his feet, and with two he flew. And one called to another and said: “Holy, holy, holy is the Lord of hosts; the whole earth is full of his glory!”*

These wonderful creatures, the seraphim, are demonstrating a reverential awe for God. Undoubtedly, they had known Him and been in close proximity to Him for a significant period. Yet, their response to His presence was extreme veneration. The seraphim were sinless. They had no moral shame and no need of repentance. Their knowledge of Him and their closeness to Him did not make Him less transcendent. The seraphim’s fearful worship declared to any observer the transcendence of their//pg. 30//God. That sacred scene forces us to ask, do our words and acts of worship declare to any and all observers the transcendence of God?

One of the first times we read of the disciples’ fearing Jesus was when He abruptly stopped the violent storm on the Sea of Galilee. The incarnate Creator commanded His creation, and a great calm replaced the strong winds and raging waves. Was the response of the disciples, “Hooray, we are saved”? Were they giving each other and Jesus high-fives? Mark tells us their exact response: “And they were filled with great fear and said to one another, Who then is this, that even the wind and the sea obey him?’” (Mark 4:41). Suddenly, they were more afraid of this man in the boat with them than they were of the storm. They had seen something of His transcendence.

Some would object and say, “Yes, but Jesus died for our sins. He died that we might stand before God knowing that no charge can be brought against us. We have been reborn by the power of the Holy Spirit and now call God ‘Father.’ ” The atoning sacrifice and the new birth are indeed great truths in our salvation. However, neither the cross nor our spiritual rebirth made God less transcendent. Remember the seraphim? They were close to God and without sin, yet they still responded with reverential awe.

The Apostle John had been as close as anyone to Jesus. He walked the roads and hills of Galilee with Him. They had spent long hours together conversing over meals. John was at the cross at Calvary, where Jesus committed to him the care of His mother. Yet, after His return to glory, when He revealed Himself to this faithful Apostle on the island of Patmos, what did John do? John says, “When I saw him, I fell at his feet as though dead” (Rev. 1:17).

There is a tension here. God the Father is our Father through the rebirth. He has told us to address Him as “Father,” a close intimate family title. Jesus is our elder brother. Therefore, there is a genuine closeness to God, a relationship. However, God is also God—glorious, majestic, holy, just, omnipotent, omniscient, eternal, transcendent. We never experience Him apart from those attributes. We have the privilege of addressing Him as Father, and there is the reality of a family relationship, but that relationship does not change the truth that we are creatures and He is the Creator. To be in His throne room with the great seraphim and romp around the throne as loving children is not a familial privilege—it is insolence to the Almighty. You never see that picture in Scripture. In that throne room, love must always be joined with reverence.

We must continually ask ourselves as ministers, officers, and members of His church, what does our worship say about our God to those who observe? Maybe the world’s lack of any fear of God has rubbed off on us more than our fear of God has rubbed off on them.

REV. JOHN P. SARTELLE SR. is senior minister of Christ Presbyterian Church (PCA) in Oakland, Tenn. He is author of What Christian Parents Should Know about Infant Baptism.

(pg. 31)

---
JANUARY 2018 DAILY BIBLE STUDIES

INTO the WORD

THE GOSPEL ACCORDING TO JOHN
                                                                                                                                                       All scripture is inspired by God and “profitable for teaching” (2 Tim. 3:16). So, we must be whole-Bible Christians, people who form our doctrine
from the entire canon of Scripture. At the same time, we recognize that certain books of the Bible, due to their style and what they ad-dress, can serve as “mini-systematic theologies” because they summarize and defend doctrine in a particularly clear way. For example, Romans presents the doctrine of salvation with special thoroughness. Isaiah helps us in particular with our doctrine of God.

The gospel of John, with its straightforward presentation of the person and work of Christ, the work of the Holy Spirit, and other doctrines, can be grouped with Romans and Isaiah as a kind of “mini- systematic theology.” This year, we will be focusing on the gospel of John in our Tabletalk daily studies, seeking to understand what it tells us about our Savior. We begin this month by examining John 1:1-2:22, which tells us of the preexistence of Christ, the ministry of John the Baptist, and more.

This section of John’s gospel also tells us much about the person of Christ. We will also be using Dr. RC. Sproul’s teaching series *The Names of Christ* to learn more about our Savior. 

ABIDING IN THE WORD 
These verses parallel the themes of the studies each week. We encourage you to hide them in your heart so that you may not sin against the Lord:

Week of January 7. . . . .JOHN 1:14-15
Week of January 14. . . . .JOHN 1:51
Week of January 21. . . . .PSALM 119:139
Week of January 28. . . . .ACTS 2:36

---
THE FOURTH GOSPEL
MONDAY 1
   
JOHN 20:30-31 "Jesus did many other signs in the presence of the disciples, which are not written in this book; but these are written so that you may believe that Jesus is the Christ, the Son of God, and that by believing you may have life in his name."

A pool shallow enough for a child to wade in yet deep enough for an elephant to swim in—that is how many people have described the gospel of John. Indeed, just a brief look at how John’s gospel has been approached proves this to be the case.

It is at the same time a text often used to disciple young children and new converts and a text that requires of commentators more than a lifetime of study if they are to expose all its treasures.

Known for its distinctive style, John stands apart from the Synoptic Gospels—Matthew, Mark, and Luke—in many ways. Whereas the Synoptics focus much of their attention on Jesus’ ministry in Galilee, John also tells us of the visits Jesus made to Judea and Jerusalem before His final journey to Jerusalem for His passion. The Synoptics have Jesus teaching mostly in parables whereas John re-cords many lengthy teaching discourses given by our Savior. These differences are not real contradictions but choices of emphasis. As an observant Jew, Jesus certainly would have gone up to Jerusalem several times in His life to observe festivals such as Passover. The Synoptics choose not to cover some of those visits. There are also extended teaching discourses in the Synoptics (for example, the Sermon on the Mount in Matt. 5-7) and metaphorical sayings in John that are similar to parables in John (John 10:1-5, for instance).

Still, it is true that John is distinctively the “most theological” of the four Gospels, as Dr. R.C. Sproul writes in his commentary John. Certainly, all of the Gospels and all of Scripture give us a theological perspective, but John does this quite directly by recording for us extended teaching sections that explicitly present and unfold key doctrines such as the person and work of the Spirit (14:15-31; 16:4-15) and the incarnation (1:1-18). No doubt this is due to this gospel’s coming from “the disciple whom Jesus loved” (13:21-24; 21:20-24), who, because of his being a member of the twelve disciples, heard much private instruction on these matters from the Savior to which the crowds were not privy. Early tradition is unanimous that this disciple was none other than John the son of Zebedee, part of the trio of disciples who were with Jesus at key points in His life and ministry (Matt. 10:1; 17:1-8; Mark 14:33-42).

John gives his purpose in writing his gospel in today’s passage. He chose key miracles and teachings of Jesus to prove He is the Savior so that we might know and believe in Christ (John 20:30-31).
   
CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

Over the course of the year ahead, we will seek to plumb the depths of John's gospel and explore its teaching on the person and work of Christ and their consequences for us. Take some time today to pray for our study that it would help us better know our Savior and equip us to follow Him more faithfully and love Him more deeply.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Luke 8:49-56
John 19:26-27; 20:1-10:21:25
1 John 1:1-4

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 1-2
Matthew 1

(pg. 34)

---
THE UNCREATED WORD
TUESDAY 2

JOHN 1:1-3 "In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the Word was God. He was in the beginning with God. All things were made through him, and without him was not any thing made that was made."

Mark starts his account of the life of Jesus with the record of Jesus’ baptism (Mark 1:1-11). Matthew and Luke go back further in the Savior’s history and begin their gospel accounts with lengthy descriptions of His birth in Bethlehem (Matt. 1-2; Luke 1-2). John, however, goes even further back. Indeed, he starts his gospel not at the beginning of Jesus’ earthly life or even the beginning of God’s dealings with His people Israel; rather, he starts before the very beginning of time itself.

We learn this from John 1:1, where the Apostle writes, “In the beginning....” This phrase echoes the opening words of Genesis 1:1, where we learn that in the beginning the only being in existence was God and that He brought creation into existence. John expands on this, telling us that with God in the beginning was the Word. Yet not only was the Word with God in the beginning, but He was God (John 1:1). Here we have one of the key texts for the biblical doctrine of the Trinity, for we see both unity and differentiation in John’s description of God and His Word. As John Calvin comments, this, and many other passages of Scripture, tells us that “Christ is of the same essence with the Father, and yet that, in some respect, he is distinct from the Father.”

Few texts assert the preexistence and deity of Christ more clearly than these opening verses of John. If we had any doubt, John also emphasizes that God made everything through the Word and that nothing that is created was made apart from the Word (v. 3). That no created thing was made apart from the Word informs us that the Word Himself is uncreated and thus without beginning or end. This uncreated Word, John tells us a few verses later, took on a human nature and became incarnate as Christ Jesus our Lord (v. 14). Only deity is uncreated, so if the Word is uncreated, He must be deity.

We cannot pass these opening verses of John by without talking about the Greek word *logos* that is translated as ‘Word” in John 1:1-18. The term has two conceptual backgrounds. First, *logos* is the Greek translation of *dabar*, which in Hebrew often refers to God’s creative word. When God utters His *dabar*, the world comes into being. John tells us that for God to utter His *dabar* is for His *logos*—His Word—to act.

Second, *logos* in first-century Greek thought referred to the principle that holds all things together and explains reality. The Greeks saw this as an abstract principle, but John corrects them. A personal being, not an abstract principle, explains and sustains existence. 

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

Among other things, Scripture directs us in how to worship God and in how to please Him. That Scripture tells us that Jesus is God incarnate means that we can and must worship Him. Jesus is not merely a good teacher or moral example. He is the very God of the universe who is owed all of our worship and praise. Let us worship Him this day.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Job 38
Isaiah 42:5
Colossians 1:15-17
Hebrews 1:1-4; 11:3

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 3-5
Matthew 2

(pg. 35)

---
THE WORD OF LIFE AND LIGHT
WEDNESDAY 3

JOHN 1:4-5 "In him was life, and the life was the light of men. The light shines in the darkness, and the darkness has not overcome it."

John 1: 1-18 introduces the story of Jesus by taking us back to eternity past and identifying Him as the eternally existent Word of God (vv. 1-3). This proclamation of Jesus’ deity receives further explication in the gospel account, particularly in chapter 8, but the deity of Christ is not the only recurring theme in John that is introduced in the prologue. Today’s passage introduces two more recurring ideas in John, namely, that the Word of God—Jesus Christ—is also the light and the life.

First, John 1:4 says that “in him [the Word] was life.” Typically in John’s gospel, references to Jesus’ being “the life” have to do with His being the source of spiritual life, the One who brings dead souls back to spiritual vitality (for example, 14:6). In 1:4, however, John is likely emphasizing the Word as the source of all biological life on account of the context’s being the work of the Word in creation (vv. 1-3). Of course, this is not at the expense of the Word’s being the source of spiritual life, for the One who in creation made the body and gave it life also in creation made the soul and gave it life. In any case, it is important to note that the Word, Jesus Christ, is not only the initial source of life in creation but is also the continuing source of life in preserving the universe (Heb. 1:1-4). The Word of God, John Calvin comments, “was not only the source of life to all the creatures, so that those which were not began to be, but that his life-giving power causes them to remain in their condition; for were it not that his continued inspiration gives vigor to the world, everything that lives would immediately decay, or be reduced to nothing.”

In John 1:4-5, we also read that Jesus is the light. As very God of very God, the Word of God is the source of all light both natural and spiritual. Created lights such as the sun and the stars shine because they were created by the God of glory, the God who shines in refulgent light (Isa. 60:1-3). But as light also shows us the way, the true path to our destination, the Word of God as the light of the world is also the source of all truth and the final goal toward which all truth points (see 14:6). When the omnipotent light who is the Word of God shines, the darkness cannot overcome Him (John 1:5). In creation, this light broke through the physical darkness (Gen. 1:1-3), and even now, human beings cannot totally suppress their awareness of this light by their sin. All people retain some knowledge of God and His attributes no matter how much they deny His truth (Rom. 1:18-32).
		 
CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

To live and to know any truth at all is to benefit from the work of the Word of God. As Christians, we are blessed to openly acknowledge Jesus as the source of life and truth, but unbelievers benefit from life and truth even while failing to recognize that these things come from God alone. It is our job to remind those around us that life and light come from God and that the Lord calls us to repent and trust in Him to benefit from His life and light eternally.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Job 33:4
Psalm 36:7-9
John 3:16
2 Corinthians 4:6

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 6-7
Matthew 3-4

(pg. 36)

---
THE WITNESS TO THE LIGHT
THURSDAY 4

JOHN 1:6-9 "There was a man sent from God, whose name was John. He came as a witness, to bear witness about the light, that all might believe through him. He was not the light, but came to bear witness about the light. The true light, which gives light to everyone, was coming into the world."

The prologue to John’s gospel, which consists of John 1:1-18, tells us much about the person of Jesus, the incarnate Word who from the beginning was God and was with God. Yet, John’s prologue also tells us about another figure. In today’s passage, we read of John the Baptist, who “came as a witness, to bear witness about the light,” namely, Jesus Christ (vv. 6-7).

John the Baptist’s appearance in all four Gospels and his bearing witness to the identity of Jesus (Matt. 3; Mark 1:1-11; Luke 3:1-22; John 1:19-34) show us just how important John is to the story of Jesus. The Evangelists—the authors of the four Gospels—believed they could not adequately explain the person and work of Christ without mentioning the witness of John the Baptist. Indeed, John’s witness was necessary, for God sent him so “that all might believe through him” (John 1:7). Before Jesus started teaching about Himself, John the Baptist provided people with the clearest understanding of who Jesus was and what He came to do. God gave him as the preeminent prophetic witness to Christ so that all might know the identity of Jesus, know His role in God’s plan, and believe in Him as Savior. And John the Baptist’s witness was not limited to the first century. Today we continue to read his words recorded in the Gospels and benefit from what they tell us about Christ.

As important as John the Baptist was and remains, however, he was only a witness. John himself was not the light of salvation (v. 8). His witness points beyond himself to the greater reality to which he testifies. John directs us to the Word, to Jesus, who is “the true light, which gives light to everyone” (v. 9). This is an interesting phrase because it indicates that Jesus is the source not only of the light of spiritual truth but of the light of all truth. Clearly, this text tells us that all people receive some light and yet not all people receive and rest in Christ for salvation. Thus, the reference must be to Christ’s granting truth beyond the truth of salvation. This is how the earliest Christian thinkers understood this text, as pointing to Jesus as the ultimate source of all truth and knowledge. John Calvin echoes this in his comments on today’s passage: “Men have this peculiar excellence which raises them above other animals, that they are endued with reason and intelligence, and that they carry the distinction between right and wrong engraven on their conscience. There is no man, therefore, whom some perception of the eternal light does not reach.”

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

Dr. R.C. Sproul writes in his commentary John: "All light finds its origin in Jesus Christ, who is the fountain of all truth." Whenever people use reason and come to the knowledge of the truth, they are benefiting from Christ's enlightening work even if they do not realize it. Because Christ is the ultimate source of the light of reason, we can reason with others about our faith, knowing that Jesus may grant them knowledge of saving truth.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Psalm 19
Proverbs 29:13
Romans 1:18-32
1 Corinthians 1:30

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 8-11
Matthew 5

(pg. 37)

---
THE RIGHT TO BE CHILDREN OF GOD
FRIDAY 5

JOHN 1:10-13 "To all who did receive him, who believed in his name, he gave the right to become children of God, who were born, not of blood nor of the will of the flesh nor of the will of man, but of God" (vv. 12-13).

In John’s gospel, the term world does not always have the same meaning, but its definition shifts depending on its context and use. Today’s passage makes this particularly clear. Building off of John 1:9, where “world” refers to the created world, the earth and its inhabitants, verse 10 features two instances of the term that have the same meaning: “He [the Word] was in the world, and the world was made through him.” Plainly, John means the created order. In His incarnation, the Word—the Son of God—entered His own creation.

But the second half of verse 10 features a shift in meaning when John says, “The world did not know him.” In other words, the world did not recognize Jesus for who He was. This cannot mean the created order in general or even all people, for in John’s gospel many people do recognize Jesus as the Christ and as the Savior (for example, 4:39-41; 9:35-39). Instead, it must be a subset of the created order that did not receive Jesus as the Christ. Augustine of Hippo identifies this subset in his sermon on today’s passage. “Who did not know? Those who, for their love of the world, are called the world.”

It was bad enough that some people rejected Jesus because of their love of this world, but even worse is that many of those who loved the world and rejected Jesus were found among His own people. The Word “came to his own, and his own people did not receive him.” John here refers to the Jewish nation as a whole and its rejection of our Lord. Although many Jews believed in Jesus, the majority did not, and this is especially tragic given that salvation must come through one born to the Jewish race (4:22). The New Testament tells us forthrightly that as an entity, the Jews have rejected Christ, but it does hold out hope that this rejection will not last forever (Rom. 9-11). One day, the Jews will turn to Jesus, not in the sense that every Jew will believe but in the sense that so many will be converted that we can say that the Jews no longer reject their Messiah.

Although at the first advent of Jesus, many Jews rejected Him, some did receive Him as Lord and Messiah. These people, John tells us, were born not of the flesh but of the spirit and they received “the right to become children of God” (John 1:13-14). Not every person has the right to be a child of God—the right to be an heir of His promises—simply by being born. Only those who are born anew spiritually and trust in Christ have that right. To become children of God in the truest and fullest sense, we must be born again (3:1-14).

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God
													   
Augustine writes, "We were not born of God in the manner in which the Only-begotten was born of Him, but were adopted by His grace." To be born again is an act of grace alone, and only God can bring us to new spiritual life. The evidence that we have been born again is that we believe in Christ. If you believe in Christ, you can know that you have been born again.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Hosea 11:1
1 John 5:1

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 12-14
Matthew 6

THE WEEKEND
Genesis 15-19
Matthew 7

(pg. 38)

---
WEEKEND DEVOTIONAL
JANUARY 6-7

PROFITABLE FOR THE KINGDOM

AARON L. GARRIOTT

Broken toys, emptied soap bottles, and lost valuables have prompted my wife and me to teach our children the biblical concept of stewardship. We remind them that things are not free, and we can’t merely replace every item that breaks or is lost. We have a responsibility to properly dispense of the goods and the gifts with which we’ve been entrusted, no matter how big or how small.

Consider the parable of the ten minas recorded in Luke 19. As they were approaching Jerusalem, Jesus told His disciples a parable involving ten servants who were each entrusted with one mina by their master who departed to receive a kingdom in a distant country. In the parable, the nobleman entrusts men with gifts to make use of and to be collected upon the nobleman’s triumphal return. Recorded are three servants who report to their master when he returns. Two of them put their minas to good use and procured a profit for their master, prompting a reward:

*The first came before him, saying, ‘Lord, your mina has made ten minas more. ’And he said to him, “Well done, good servant! Because you have been faithful in a very little, you shall have authority over ten cities. ”And the second came, saying, “Lord, your mina has made five minas.” And he said to him, “And you are to be over five cities.” (Luke 19:16-19)*

The third merely stashed his away, adding no value to his gift (v. 20), and received the sharpest rebuke: “Why then did you not put my money in the bank, and at my coming I might have collected it with interest?” (v. 23). These contrasting responses demonstrate the master’s expectations with regard to the use and outcome of the servants’ derivative authority.

This parable, like most, reveals something about the kingdom of God. In particular, Jesus discloses His imminent departure from earth upon accomplishing the work that His Father had given Him (John 17). In His ascension, He was to receive a kingdom that won’t be fully consummated until He returns in glory after a period of invisible reign (Heb. 2:2-6). The ascended Lord has given us gifts, and He expects us to be wise in the way we use those gifts so that we might offer Him a profit. Christ’s ascension wasn’t a prolonged vacation. He reigns over all, having received from His Father an eternal and unshakable kingdom (Col. 1:13; Heb. 12:28), and He now dispenses gifts to His people for the good of the church and the renown of His name. Christians, then, enjoy a sober responsibility. We must be highly profitable, putting our gifts to use so as to provide a gain for God, which implies that dispensing of our gifts wisely somehow yields a profit for God’s kingdom.

When the King returns in triumph, He will call us to account for how we’ve used what we’ve been given—our time, our talents, and our treasures. Consider the talents and treasures you’ve been given. How can you put these to use for your Master?

AARON L. GARRIOTT is production manager of Tabletalk magazine and a student at Reformed Theological Seminary in Orlando, Fla.

(pg. 39)

---
THE INCARNATION OF THE WORD OF GOD
MONDAY 8

JOHN 1:14-15 "And the Word became flesh and dwelt among us, and we have seen his glory, glory as of the only Son from the Father, full of grace and truth" (v. 14).

Scripture’s doctrine of divine transcendence tells us that God is set apart from creation and cannot be identified with creation. He “sits above the circle of the earth” on His throne and rules and reigns over the universe, the created order being subject to Him (Isa. 40:22-23). At the same time, the Bible tells us of God’s immanence, that though He is set apart and set over us, He is always close to us. We can hide nowhere from His presence, for He is present everywhere (Ps. 139:7-12). The Creator who is far above us as our Lord is also near that which He rules.

God’s willingness to be near His creation is seen perhaps most clearly in today’s passage, which describes the incarnation of the Word of God. The Word of God, being God Himself, “became flesh” (John 1:14). This expression stresses the humanity that the Word added to Himself in the incarnation. The Word did not merely fill a human body, taking the place of its heart, soul, and mind. No, the Word “became flesh.” He took on everything that is inherent to true humanity without surrendering anything of His deity such that the incarnate Son of God is no less human than any other human being.

In the incarnation, the Word not only became flesh but He “dwelt among us” (v. 14). Notably, this phrase is the same one used in the Greek to mean “pitch a tent,” and it is closely related to the Greek word for the ancient Israelite tabernacle, which was itself a tent (see Ex. 26). Here we have the first indication in John’s gospel that Jesus is the new tabernacle/temple for the people of God. If we want to meet our Creator and worship Him, we must do so in Christ.

John’s references to the glory of Jesus in John 1:14 confirm the idea that Jesus fulfills the old covenant tabernacle/temple. Under the old covenant, the glory of God took up residence in the tabernacle and the temple (Ex. 40:34; 1 Kings 8:1-11), and this is the very same glory seen in Christ. God frequently manifests His glory as bright, refulgent light (Ex. 34:29-35; Isa. 60:1; Rev. 21:23), so for John to say we have beheld the glory of Jesus almost certainly refers to his experience of the Transfiguration when the glorious light of Jesus’ deity was revealed to Peter, James, and John (Matt. 17:1-8). However, the Transfiguration does not exhaust the view of Jesus’ glory that John and others experienced during our Lord’s earthly ministry. Jesus also revealed His glory in His miraculous signs (John 2:11). In working miracles, Christ showed something of His glory in His authority and power. 

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

In Christ alone can we meet God as Savior, so we can rightly worship God only in and through Christ. We cannot join with nonbelievers in their worship, for they do not worship God in and through Christ, and we must seek to proclaim the gospel so that others may know where they can meet God as their Savior.

FOR FURTHER STUDY

2 Chronicles 5:2-14
Psalm 57
Jeremiah 13:16
Philippians 2:5-11

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 20-22
Matthew 8

(pg. 40)

---
THE FULL AND FINAL REVELATION OF GOD
TUESDAY 9

JOHN 1:16-18 "From his fullness we have all received, grace upon grace. For the law was given through Moses; grace and truth came through Jesus Christ. No one has ever seen God; the only God, who is at the Father's side, he has made him known."

Grace—the kindness and favor that God shows to undeserving people—is such a commonly mentioned concept that we can miss its inherent wonder. In the Christian church, we frequently refer to the “grace of God,” and in so doing we run the risk of making it into a common and ordinary thing. But when we have a proper estimation of our own condition as sinful creatures who deserve only the wrath of the Lord, and when we understand that God does not give His grace to everyone (Rom. 1:18-3:20; 9-11), we will be much less likely to take grace for granted. And once we understand the truth of our condition, knowing the sheer abundance of grace in light of our sin will keep us marveling at the kindness of our Creator.

The abundance of divine grace is John’s theme as the Evangelist concludes His prologue. We find in today’s passage an emphasis on God’s grace in sending the Word, Jesus Christ (John 1:16-18). “Grace upon grace” has been given to us in the Savior, not merely “grace.” Interestingly, this phrase may be better translated “grace instead of grace,” suggesting the exchange of one kind of “lesser” grace, for “greater” grace. This would be supported by John’s contrast between the law given through Moses and the grace and truth given through Jesus Christ (v. 17). John does not mean that the era of law preceding Moses was entirely devoid of grace and truth. After all, the Mosaic law includes the sacrificial system through which old covenant saints could experience the grace of forgiveness. Furthermore, in John’s gospel we read that if Jesus’ opponents really believed Moses, then they would have believed in Jesus as the Christ (5:30-47). If we receive grace and truth through Jesus and if to truly believe Moses’ testimony in the law is to believe in Jesus, then grace and truth were available under the Mosaic administration. It is not the absence and presence of grace that are contrasted but the lesser measure and greater measure of grace. John Calvin writes of the new covenant believer that “what is ascribed to us is not simply or absolutely denied to [old covenant saints], but that a comparison is made between the less and the greater, as we say; because they had nothing more than little sparks of the true light, the full brightness of which daily shines around us.”

We receive a greater measure of grace under the new covenant because the new covenant features the zenith of God’s revelation of Christ, God’s incarnate Word (1:18). In Him we see God most clearly (Heb. 1:1-4).

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

Grace was present under the old covenant, but the new covenant advent of Christ and His teaching through His Apostles shows us grace in greater measure. We now have more insight into the depths of God's mercy in sending His Son to die for sinners. We receive a greater measure of the Holy Spirit than the old covenant saints had. Let us rejoice to be partakers of the new covenant and look to Christ for the fullest revelation of God.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Jeremiah 31
Zechariah 12:10
Titus 2:11-14
Revelation 22:21

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 23-24
Matthew 9

(pg. 41)

---
JOHN THE BAPTIST IDENTIFIES HIMSELF
WEDNESDAY 10

JOHN 1:19-23 "[John] said, Ί am the voice of one crying out in the wilderness, Make straight the way of the Lord, as the prophet Isaiah said'" (v. 23).

Four hundred years or so passed between the end of the ministry of the prophet Malachi and the appearance of John the Baptist in the wilderness of Judea (Matt. 3:1). During those four centuries, there was no prophet in Israel, but the Jews knew that at least one more prophet would be sent by God before the day of the Lord. As Malachi 4:5 explains, God had promised to send Elijah to turn the hearts of the fathers to their children and the hearts of the children to their fathers before the final judgment.

Given this reality, it is no surprise that people took notice when John the Baptist arrived on the scene appearing much like the prophet Elijah (2 Kings 1:7-8; Mark 1:6). John’s gospel tells us that John the Baptist’s ministry caught the attention of the Jewish leaders, for the Jews of Jerusalem—likely a reference to the ruling council known as the Sanhedrin—sent a group to inquire into the identity of John (John 1:19). The reason for the inquiry was likely as political as it was religious, for during the first century, it was not uncommon for Jewish individuals to proclaim themselves the Messiah and attempt to lead an uprising against the occupying Roman Empire.

In any case, John responded to the party inquiring after him that he was not the Christ—the promised Messiah who would restore Israel—or “the Prophet”—the prophet like Moses who would mediate a new covenant (Deut. 18:15). Interestingly, John the Baptist also denied that he was the Elijah predicted in Malachi 4:5, which seems to contradict Jesus’ statement after John’s death that John fulfilled this prophecy (Matt. 17:9-13). The reason for this difference lies in a misunderstanding as to what Malachi meant. The Jews were expecting a literal return of Elijah, and in that respect, John the Baptist certainly was not Elijah. However, Malachi did not predict a return of the very same Elijah in the flesh. Just as many prophets used the name “David” as a designation for the coming Messiah from David’s line, Malachi used “Elijah” to identify a coming prophet who would have much in common with Elijah’s ministry. So, in the sense that John came with a ministry like Elijah’s, he certainly fulfilled Malachi’s prophecy about Elijah (see Jer. 30:9; Luke 1:8-17).

But John the Baptist told the Jews more than who he was not. He told them he was the voice crying in the wilderness predicted by Isaiah (John 1:22-23; see Isa. 40:3-5). John the Baptist was the one sent by God to proclaim the restoration of the kingdom.

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God
	  
John the Baptist was careful not to claim more for himself than he actually deserved, and he eagerly pointed people to Christ. In that way, he serves as a model for us. We should not claim more about ourselves than is actually true, and we should be ready to proclaim Christ to the people we know.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
1 Kings 21:17-29
Mark 9:2-13
Luke 11:45-52
Romans 12:3

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 25-26
Matthew 10:1-25

(pg. 42)

---
THE BAPTISM OF JOHN
THURSDAY 11

JOHN 1:24-28 "They asked [John], 'Then why are you baptizing, if you are neither the Christ, nor Elijah, nor the Prophet?'" (v. 25).

Leviticus 26 and Deuteronomy 28 record the covenant curses that God said would come on the old covenant community for flagrant, impenitent violations of the Mosaic law. The history of old covenant Israel shows us that despite God’s patience with His people and His sending them many prophets to call them to repentance, the Lord finally grew tired of the people’s impenitence and visited the worst of the covenant curses upon them—exile. In 722 BC, Assyria conquered the northern kingdom of Israel and took the Israelites from their land, and Babylon did the same thing to Judah and the Judahites in 586 BC (2 Kings 17; 25).

When the Jews came back to their land in 538 BC, sin was still a problem, as we see in the books of Ezra, Nehemiah, Haggai, Zechariah, and Malachi. Over time, however, many Jews developed a new resolve to keep the Mosaic law and to avoid sin in order to prevent the exile from happening again. While those desires were commendable, many Jews crossed the line into legalism. They came up with many traditions and extra rules as a “fence around the Torah.” By keeping these extra rules, they reasoned, they would avoid breaking the actual commandments of the Mosaic law. And in time, these traditions came to be seen as part of the law itself. The chief party that took this approach was the Pharisees. Because of the Pharisees’ outward piety and concern for the law, the common people looked to them as exemplars of holiness.

Understandably, these Pharisees became concerned when John the Baptist came calling for all the Jews to be baptized for the forgiveness of sin (Mark 1:4). Surely at least some Jews, they thought, such as the Pharisees, would not need to be baptized because of their holiness. That explains why the Pharisees were associated with the group of people sent from Jerusalem to investigate John the Baptist’s practice. He would need divine authority to make such an audacious claim that even the Pharisees needed baptism (John 4:24-25).

John’s answer was to point beyond himself to another in their midst who had the kind of authority the Pharisees were asking about. John the Baptist came as a witness to a greater figure, One whose sandal he could not untie (vv. 26-29). Since first-century Jewish disciples could do almost everything for their masters except untie their sandals, an act reserved for slaves, this shows the depths of John’s humility. As necessary as John’s ministry was, it would be eclipsed.

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

John the Baptist was the most significant herald of the coming King. However, all Christians are in some ways heralds of the King. We are called not to point to ourselves but to point beyond ourselves to the Savior. Whether we are speaking of Christ to our children, our neighbors, or anyone else, we should be declaring Him and what He has done, not promoting ourselves.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Isaiah 40:9-11
Malachi 4:5-6
Mark 1:7
Luke 1:57-80

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 27-28
Matthew 1O:26-42

(pg. 43)

---
JOHN THE BAPTIST BEARS WITNESS TO CHRIST
FRIDAY 12

JOHN 1:29-34 "John bore witness: I saw the Spirit descend from heaven like a dove, and it remained on him. I myself did not know him, but he who sent me to baptize with water said to me, He on whom you see the Spirit descend and remain, this is he who baptizes with the Holy Spirit'" (vv. 32-33).

Having seen that John the Baptist understood himself as the forerunner and herald of Jesus (John 1:19-28), we read in today’s passage of how John pointed out Jesus and His role to others. In so doing, he revealed much about the Savior.

First, John the Baptist proclaimed to the crowd, when he saw Jesus coming, “Behold, the Lamb of God who takes away the sin of the world!” (v. 29). This statement raises some difficulties at first because this forthright proclamation of Jesus’ significance does not seem to be in line with John the Baptist’s later doubts concerning the work of Jesus when John suffered in prison under Herod (Matt, 11:2-3). On that occasion, John apparently found it hard to believe that his suffering could be reconciled with Jesus’ ministry if Jesus was, in fact, the Messiah. How could he, the Messianic forerunner, suffer if Jesus came to set things right in creation. Here we should make allowances for John’s human weaknesses. John was a fine man of God, but he was not sinless, and under great trial he found himself wondering about whether he had understood Jesus’ identity correctly. Kind Savior that He is, Jesus did not rebuke John for his doubts, but He replied by describing the works He was doing, works that the prophet Isaiah said would be the works of the Messiah (vv. 4-6; see Isa. 42:6-7; 61:1-2). Essentially, Jesus reassured John that he was correct about Jesus’ identity as the Messiah and the Lamb of God.

The sin that the Lamb of God takes away is the sin of the world (John 1:29). Here the word “world” refers to all people without distinction, not all people without exception. That is, Jesus did not take away the sin of every person who has ever lived but only those who trust in Him (vv. 11-13). He made no distinction regarding the kinds of people for whom He died. Jesus, as the Lamb of God, atoned for the sins of rich people, poor people, Africans, Asians, Americans, Europeans, rulers, servants, men, women—all kinds of people.

John the Baptist also told the people that he himself did not know Jesus but that His identity was revealed to him (vv. 31-34). This does not mean John had never met Jesus before; after all, they were relatives (see Luke 1:26-45). John the Baptist’s point was that his insight into Jesus’ identity was not due to personal acquaintance but by revelation from God. As the early church father John Chrysostom writes, John the Baptist’s knowledge of Jesus’ identity “was not from human friendship, but had been caused by divine revelation.”

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God
													   
John the Baptist needed a special revelation from God to know who Jesus was, and this parallels the illumination that all sinners need if they are to see Jesus as Savior and believe in Him. While we must bear accurate witness to Christ, no one will believe our testimony, no matter how accurate it is, unless God opens the eyes of their hearts. Let us pray that He would do that for our loved ones who do not know Jesus as Savior.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Isaiah 42:1
Luke 3:21-22

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 29-30
Matthew 11

THE WEEKEND
Genesis 31-35
Matthew 12

(pg. 44)

---
WEEKEND DEVOTIONAL
JANUARY 13-14

YOUR WORDS REVEAL YOUR HEART

STEFFEN MUELLER

The ability to speak and use words is crucial to our human existence. We need the spoken word from other people; we especially need to hear that we are loved and appreciated.

Imagine how you would feel if just for one single day you talked to a number of people, but no one responded; no one said a single word back to you. Now imagine that on the same day you wrote several e-mails and a couple of things on Facebook and sent some text messages and didn’t get a single response. No spoken word and no written word whatsoever. I am sure that you would be surprised, wondering what’s going on, and would maybe even be terrified. We need to communicate, to be heard, to speak our hearts to other people and to be understood.

Language is a gift that we don’t often appreciate. The fact that you and I can speak words and write words is a great blessing from our holy God. We use our words in ways both great—such as building relationships—and trivial—such as discussing the weather or sporting events. But this gift of words comes with a great responsibility: to use our words to glorify God—to build up, to encourage, and to show love.

Scripture is clear that words can be powerful. In Proverbs 18:21, we read, “Death and life are in the power of the tongue, and those who love it will eat its fruits.” Growing up in Germany, I remember my pastor talking about a man who was about seventy years old. In his old age, he was still struggling with words that his mother had spoken to him when he was a child. Her words were: “We never wanted you; you were simply an accident.” With our words, we have the power to do good or to harm.

In Matthew 12, Jesus teaches the connection between our words and our hearts. He says that simply trying harder to be good will not work because the root of the problem is within us. He says:

*Either make the tree good and its fruit good, or make the tree bad and its fruit bad for the tree is known its fruit. You brood of vipers! How can you speak good, when you are evil? For out of the abundance of the heart the mouth speaks. The good person out of his good treasure brings forth good, and the evil person out of his evil treasure brings forth evil. (Matt. 12:33-35)*

The words we speak show what is in our hearts. If our hearts are evil, then the words we speak and write will be evil too. In James 3:8, God’s Word says: “No human being can tame the tongue. It is a restless evil, full of deadly poison.”

Trying harder is not sufficient. What we need is a new heart—a heart that can only be given to us by the Lord Jesus Christ. How can we receive a new heart? By confessing our sins to Jesus Christ, including our evil words, and by receiving His grace and forgiveness. If we repent and believe in Jesus Christ, then we can be assured that Almighty God says to us: “I love you with an everlasting love. My Son Jesus Christ has given His life so that you can live.”

REV. STEFFEN MUELLER is church-planting pastor of Gospel Church Munchen in Munich, Germany.

(pg. 45)

---
BECOMING DISCIPLES OF JESUS
MONDAY 15

JOHN 1:35-39 "The next day again John was standing with two of his disciples, and he looked at Jesus as he walked by and said, 'Behold, the Lamb of God!' The two disciples heard him say this, and they followed Jesus" (vv. 35-37).

Isaiah 42:1-9 is one of several Servant Songs in the book of Isaiah that refer to the work of the coming Messiah. Roughly seven hundred years before the birth of Jesus, God revealed to the prophet Isaiah that He would send forth His Servant to bring justice to the earth (vv. 1, 4), and that His Spirit would anoint this Servant in order to perform this task. Although John the Baptist did not have a complete understanding of all that would mean—that the Savior’s work of bringing justice would involve judging God’s enemies and bearing the just wrath of God against His people—the Spirit’s descent upon Jesus at His baptism did show John that Jesus was this Servant (John 1:29-34; see Luke 3:21-22).

Of course, John the Baptist did not keep this revelation of Jesus’ identity to himself, but he proclaimed it to others. He made this announcement before both the crowds of ordinary Jewish citizens as well as those who represented the leading Jews in Jerusalem (John 1:29-34). But he also announced Jesus to his own disciples. As a preacher and prophet, John the Baptist had attracted his own band of disciples, or learners, and he was not afraid to lose them. If he had wanted to keep his followers for himself, John would have not told them about the coming Messiah or would have stood in their way as they left him to follow Jesus. However, John did not do that. He understood his role as the forerunner, so he let two of his disciples go after Jesus (vv. 35-37). Later on, one of these initial disciples is identified—Andrew, Simon Peter’s brother (v. 40)—but the other disciple is never named. Traditionally, commentators have argued that this second disciple was none other than John the son of Zebedee, author of the gospel of John, and that is likely correct given that John chooses never to identify himself by name in his gospel account. In any case, it is worth noting that John 1:35-39 does not record Jesus’ issuing a formal call to discipleship. That official call to leave everything and follow Jesus came later, as the other gospel accounts tell us (Mark 1:16-20). Today’s account shows us that initially, at least some of Jesus’ disciples started listening to Him as the result of John’s testimony.

Heeding John the Baptist’s testimony, Andrew and John went with Jesus and spent the rest of the day with Him. It was about four o’clock in the afternoon on that day (the “tenth hour” according to first-century Jews’ reckoning of time), and so the disciples began what the New Testament says was a life of discipleship (John 1:38-39).

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God
		
To be a true disciple of John the Baptist was to heed what he said about the Messiah and follow the Christ when He arrived. If we are to be true disciples of God's Word, then we must likewise follow Christ. As we study the Scriptures, let us look for how God's Word points to Jesus and let us commit ourselves to following Him wherever He leads.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
1 Kings 19:19-21
Matthew 4:18-22
Mark 6:1 Acts 6:7

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 36-37
Matthew 13:1-23

(pg. 46)

---
JESUS MEETS SIMON
TUESDAY 16

JOHN 1:40-42 "[Andrew] first found his own brother Simon and said to him, 'We have found the Messiah' (which means Christ). He brought him to Jesus. Jesus looked at him and said, 'You are Simon the son of John. You shall be called Cephas' (which means Peter)" (vv. 41-42).

Andrew, a former disciple of John the Baptist, was among the first to follow Jesus (John 1:35-40), and the first thing he did after leaving John for Jesus was to go to his brother and tell him that he had found the promised Messiah (v. 41). Although Andrew is not often mentioned in the New Testament, it is notable that in the other places he is mentioned in John’s gospel, he is bringing people to Jesus (6:8-9; 12:20-2 2). This indicates that to be a disciple of Jesus is to bring others to Him, to introduce Jesus to others insofar as we are able.

Perhaps the most important thing Andrew ever did as a disciple of Jesus was to introduce his brother Simon to Jesus. Simon, as is well known, would go on to serve a foundational role in the establishment of the Christian church, and that is foreshadowed here in Jesus’ renaming of Simon as Cephas or Peter (1:42). Aramaic was the common language of first-century Jews in Palestine, and Cephas comes from the Aramaic word that means “rock.” Uteris from the Greek term that means the same thing. Jesus would again identify Simon as Peter, the rock, later in His ministry (Matt. 16:13-20), but this record in John’s gospel tells us that Jesus identified Peter as the “rock,” as having a key role among the disciples, long before Peter’s confession at Caesarea Philippi. He would be essential for laying the foundation of the church by preaching on Pentecost, by being the instrument through whom God worked to convert the first Gentiles to Christ, and by writing parts of the New Testament (Acts 2; 10; 1 and 2 Peter).

We have noted that Andrew, Simon Peter’s brother, does not play as large a role in the foundation of the new covenant church as does Peter. Yet, it was through Andrew that Peter first met Jesus. John Calvin has some interesting comments on this fact and what it means about our positions in the Christian community. “We ought also to observe the purpose of God, which determined that Peter, who was to be far more eminent, was brought to the knowledge of Christ by the agency and ministry of Andrew; that none of us, however excellent, may refuse to be taught by an inferior.” Essentially, Calvin argues, the story of Peter and Andrew shows us how even the most honored among us should not think themselves unable to benefit from the teaching and gifts of others. None of us should ever think we have reached a point where other Christians have nothing to teach us. ש

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

God has gifted the body of Christ with many different people who have many different gifts, experiences, and levels of knowledge. All of us can benefit from one another no matter how long we have been believers, and all of us can be a blessing to others. Let us seek to learn from others in the church and to be a means of edifying them as well.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Isaiah 54:13
Mark 3:13-19
Luke 5:1-11
Colossians 3:16

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 38-40
Matthew 13:24-58

(pg. 47)

---
GOOD FROM NAZARETH
WEDNESDAY 17

JOHN 1:43-46 "Philip found Nathanael and said to him, 'We have found him of whom Moses in the Law and also the prophets wrote, Jesus of Nazareth, the son of Joseph.' Nathanael said to him, 'Can anything good come out of Nazareth?' Philip said to him, 'Come and see'" (vv. 45-46).

After the decisions of Andrew, Peter, and (most likely) John the son of Zebedee to follow Jesus, our Savior made the decision to head for Galilee (John 1:35-43). Before heading for Galilee, Jesus had been working in the southern portion of the Promised Land, close to where the Jordan River meets the Dead Sea. To set out for Galilee was to head to the northern part of the Promised Land, where Jesus would conduct much of His earthly ministry.

Today’s passage says that at that point, Jesus also called as His disciple Philip, who was from Bethsaida in Galilee, the same place where Andrew and Peter came from (vv. 43-44). This does not necessarily mean Philip was living in Bethsaida when Jesus met him, but it could mean the place where Philip was raised. This was certainly the case for Andrew and Peter, for we know from Mark 1:21, 29 that they made their home in Capernaum when they began following Jesus. But John says they were from Bethsaida because that is where they spent their formative years, just as the Gospels refer to Jesus as from Nazareth because that is where He grew up before later moving to Capernaum (Matt. 2:19-23; 4:13).

The New Testament tells us clearly that Nazareth was an insignificant, even despised, town. Even fellow Galileans looked down on Nazareth, as is evident in the response of Nathanael when Philip told him about finding the Messiah (John 1:46). Plainly, Nathanael could not believe that the promised Savior would come from such a humble locale. Nathanael, it should be noted, is likely the same person as Bartholomew, who is listed among Jesus’ twelve disciples in the Synoptic Gospels (Matt, 10:3; Mark 3:18; Luke 6:14). Bartholomew means “son of Tolmai,” so his full name would have been Nathanael son of Tolmai.

If Nathanael had been a better student of the Hebrew Scriptures, or the Old Testament, he would not have been so surprised that the Messiah would come from Nazareth. Isaiah 53:1-3 reveals that the Messiah would have “no form or majesty” and would be “despised and rejected by men.” His upbringing in Nazareth, therefore, was one of the ways in which Isaiah’s prophecy was fulfilled. The Messiah, who would be despised by the majority of His own people, began life as a citizen of a despised town. Yet as Nathanael would learn, one cannot judge the Messiah’s claims based on His hometown. Much good, in fact, would come from Nazareth as Jesus began His ministry.

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God
					   
The humble origins of Jesus are one of the clearest indications that His kingdom is not of this world. He came in humility, showing us that God's view of greatness is in many ways different from what the world tells us is great. We must measure greatness and success according to God's standards, not the standards of this world.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
2 Chron. 36:15-16
Matthew 2:23
Mark 6:1-6
Luke 9:21-22

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 41
Matthew 14:1-21

(pg. 48)

---
SEEING THE WAY OF SALVATION
THURSDAY 18

JOHN 1:47-51 "[Jesus] said to him, 'Truly, truly, I say to you, you will see heaven opened, and the angels of God ascending and descending on the Son of Man'" (v. 51).

Nathanael found it difficult to believe that the Messiah could come from Nazareth, but he agreed to go with Philip to see for himself if what Philip had said was true (John 1:46). Today’s passage records Nathanael’s first encounter with Jesus, who opens their dialogue by addressing him as “an Israelite indeed, in whom there is no deceit!” (v. 47). In this statement, we see that Jesus saw no ulterior motives in Nathanael’s visitation. Nathanael was coming to figure out who Jesus was and whether Philip was right about Him, and he was not hiding that fact from others.

As we see in John 1:48, Nathanael was surprised that Jesus could see the truth of his intentions, for how could an ordinary man see into another’s heart? But Jesus then offered further proof that He was no ordinary man by telling Nathanael that he saw him under a fig tree before Philip came to him (v. 48). It is not exactly clear what Jesus meant by this statement. It could be that Jesus saw Nathanael sitting in the shade of a literal fig tree. It could also be that Jesus meant that he saw Nathanael sitting at his home, for ancient Jews sometimes used the term “fig tree” as a metaphor for a person’s house. Either way, Nathanael recognized that Jesus saw something about him that required supernatural knowledge because Jesus had never met him before. Thus, Nathanael recognized Jesus as the Son of God and King of Israel, the One invested with divine authority to rule and reign as Messiah (v. 49).

As great a sign as supernatural insight was, Jesus’ response to Nathanael was that he would yet see something greater: “heaven opened, and the angels of God ascending and descending on the Son of Man”  (vv. 50-51). Here we find an allusion to Jacob’s dream of a ladder joining earth and heaven (Gen. 28:40-22). Essentially, Jesus was telling Nathanael that He is the link between earth and heaven, that if a person is to ascend to heaven—attain salvation—he must do it through Christ Jesus (John 14:6). To see Jesus display supernatural knowledge was incredible indeed. But a far better vision is to see that Jesus is the way to salvation, the means through which we find eternal life. Many people saw Jesus do supernatural things in the first century, but fewer saw and believed in Him as the way to salvation. Things are not so different today. Many people view Jesus as a great man. Even some who are not believers have affirmed that He did miracles. But only those in whom the Spirit works will receive Him as Savior.

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

John Calvin comments that "though the whole human race was banished from the kingdom of God, the gate of heaven is now opened to us" in Christ. On this side of heaven, the greatest thing we can see is Jesus as the way of salvation. Seeing and believing in Him is the only way to heaven. Are you trusting in Christ alone for your salvation? Are you asking Him to open the eyes of your loved ones who do not believe?

FOR FURTHER STUDY
2 Chronicles 20:17
Psalm 28:1-3
Luke 2:22-38
John 20:24-28

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 42-43
Matthew 14:22-36

(pg. 49)

---
THE WEDDING AT CANA
FRIDAY 19

JOHN 2:1-5 "Jesus said to [Mary], 'Woman, what does this have to do with me? My hour has not yet come.' His mother said to the servants, 'Do whatever he tells you'" (vv. 4-5).

One only needs a basic familiarity with the life of Jesus to know that His earthly ministry was characterized by two key things: preaching/teaching and miracles. Thus far in our study of John’s gospel, we have seen a little bit of our Lord’s teaching in His revelation of Himself as the way to salvation (John 1:51). In today’s passage, we begin to study the first of Jesus’ miracles, His turning the water to wine at Cana.

The setting was a wedding attended by Jesus, His disciples, and Mary His mother (2:1-2). Because both Jesus and His mother were invited to the celebration, the marriage was probably a family affair; one of their relatives likely was getting married. We should also note that in the first century, weddings lasted longer than they do today. The celebration could go for as long as a week, and the guests would stay for days. That Jesus would attend such a lavish party says something about the goodness of such events. Certainly, Jesus calls us to a life of self-denial (Matt. 16:24), but this does not require an austere lifestyle that has no place for fun or festivities.

In the course of the celebration at Cana, the wine ran out, as we see in John 2:3. This prompted Mary to come to Jesus for a solution to the problem (vv. 4-5). What Mary expected Jesus to do is not entirely clear. Given that His earthly father, Joseph, likely had been dead for some time and that Mary therefore had to rely on Jesus for support, it could just be that she expected Him to procure wine by ordinary means, or perhaps she was looking for a miracle. In any case, what we do know is that this story does not offer support for the idea that we should go to Mary and ask her to intercede for us, as the story is sometimes read in Roman Catholicism. There is no evidence that the hosts of the wedding celebration asked Mary to talk to Jesus for them, and the story is only about an episode while Mary was still alive. It says nothing about her role, if any, after her death.

What the episode does tell us, however, is that it would be Jesus who would determine when to perform miracles and what miracles He would do. We see this in John 2:4, where we see that Jesus told Mary that His time had “not yet come.” While Jesus would actually intervene to solve the lack of wine, He did not finally do so merely because His mother asked but because He made the ultimate determination as to when to begin His public miracles. As our Sovereign, Jesus determines when and how to answer every prayer.

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

Jesus is our Lord and Teacher, and His willingness to celebrate at a wedding and even to receive extravagant gifts (John 12:1-8) shows us that Christian discipleship is not incompatible with enjoying nice things in life. We are called to be generous and to be willing to give our all for Jesus, but we may also enjoy all of the good gifts He has made.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Song 3:6-11
Mark 2:18-22

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Genesis 44-45
Matthew 15:1-20

THE WEEKEND
Genesis 46-Exodus 1
Matthew 15:21-16:4

(pg. 50)

---
WEEKEND DEVOTIONAL
JANUARY 20-21

THE IDOLATRY OF SPORTS

JON D. PAYNE

A few years ago, a friend treated my son and me to a tour of St. James’ Park, the home grounds of Newcastle United F.C., a famous English Premier League soccer club. Having spent a good portion of my life on the soccer pitch, I could not help but be impressed by the beautifully manicured (and heated) playing surface, palatial locker rooms, and illustrious trophy collection. St. James’ Park is truly a first-class stadium. As the tour continued, however, I began to feel uncomfortable. It was becoming increasingly apparent that Newcastle United was more than just a soccer team to the tour guide. The team was his identity, his religion, his life.

After the tour, we hunted for a souvenir in the stadium shop. Sadly, we found a shirt that audaciously declared, “St. James’ Park is My Church & Newcastle United is My God.” Not only was this declaration blasphemous, it was a stark reminder that idolatry comes in all forms; yes, even sports.

Idolatry is the replacement of God with something else, the yielding of our primary devotion and chief affections to anything or anyone besides the Lord. It is the “giving of that worship and glory to any other, which is due to him alone” (Westminster Shorter Catechism 47; see Isa. 42:8). Indeed, the first commandment unequivocally states, “You shall have no other gods before me.... You shall not bow down to them or serve them” (Ex. 20:3, 5). Dear believer, God will entertain no rivals—sports included.

I grew up the oldest son of a prominent sportswriter and have been around sports for as long as I can remember. For many years, my dad was the beat writer for the San Francisco 49ers and Oakland Raiders. He covered major international soccer matches and multiple college sports. He introduced me to dozens of famous athletes, many of whom inspired me to pursue and realize my own athletic dreams. As a result, I am very thankful for sports. They have played an important and valuable role in my life. Sports bring people together. They encourage health and fitness. They cultivate grit and discipline. They provide an array of life lessons. They can also be a wholesome source of entertainment. Sports are a gift from God. However, as with anything, if we are not careful, the gift can supplant the Giver. Sports can become a golden calf that leads us down the path of idolatry.

A friend and former college football star told my son, “Sports are great, but they make a terrible god.” This is a message that athletes and sports fans need to hear today, especially since sports are given such an inordinately prominent status in our culture.

Do sports hold a higher priority in your life than Jesus? Is God on the sidelines of your heart? Have your Lord’s Days morphed into sports days? May sports never take precedence over your relationship with or devotion to the living God. “Little children, keep yourselves from idols” (1 John 5:21).

DR. JON D. PAYNE is senior minister of Christ Church Presbyterian (PCA) in Charleston, S.C., visiting lecturer in practical theology at Reformed Theological Seminary in Atlanta, and author of In the Splendor of Holiness.

(pg. 51)

---
THE FIRST OF JESUS’ SIGNS
MONDAY 22

JOHN 2:6-12 "This, the first of his signs, Jesus did at Cana in Galilee, and manifested his glory. And his disciples believed in him" (v. 11).

Given that first-century Jews were expected to provide food and drink for their guests when they held a wedding, that the wedding party at Cana was running short on wine carried with it the threat of social embarrassment for the bridegroom (John 2:1-3). Therefore, our Savior’s willingness to intervene and rectify the situation, as we see in today’s passage, was clearly a gracious act with respect to the bridegroom (vv. 6-11). It was not Jesus’ fault that there was no wine left, and He was under no obligation to provide assistance. In His grace, however, Jesus solved the problem for the bridegroom and made it possible for the festivities to continue.

John notes that the jars used to house the water that would be made into wine were “for the Jewish rites of purification” (v. 6). Although it is difficult to be certain, it may be that John includes this detail to make a theological point. Many commentators be-lieve that Jesus’ altering water used for purification was a way to make a theological point about His own significance. Jewish rites of purification, of course, were associated with the ceremonial law of the old covenant. The Aaronic priests had to wash before entering the tabernacle and temple (Ex. 30:47-24), and the book of Leviticus prescribes various washings for ordinary Israelites to perform in order to deal with ritual uncleanness. The jars at the wedding feast were probably used for washing the hands before eating, an act not prescribed by the Old Testament but that had been adopted by many practitioners of first-century Judaism (Mark 7:1-4). By changing the water of purification associated with the old covenant and with Judaism into wine, Jesus may have been indicating that something new had arrived—that anew order was replacing the old and that the ceremonial law would be fulfilled and transformed. Of course, we do not need this reading of John 2 to be correct in order to affirm that basic point. On another occasion, He likened His ministry to that of new wine (Matt. 9:14-17), telling us directly that the new order was arriving that would replace the old. An abundance of wine is often associated with the new messianic age in the Old Testament (for example, Isa. 2 5).

John concludes this account of Jesus’ first miracle by saying that it manifested the glory of Christ (John 2:11). This was the first glimpse that the disciples had of our Lord’s divine power in action.

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God
			
Jesus fulfills the old covenant revelation, bringing something new. The moral law continues, but the outward administration of the covenant has changed. Baptism and the Lord's Supper have replaced the old covenant rituals. God's covenant people are no longer drawn primarily from one ethnic group. The Holy Spirit has been poured out upon us. We are new creatures in Christ, so let us be grateful that He is renewing us after His image.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Joel 3:17-21
Amos 9:11-15
Zechariah 9:14-17
Luke 5:33-38

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Exodus 2-4
Matthew 16:5-28

(pg. 54)

---
JESUS CLEANSES THE TEMPLE
TUESDAY 23

JOHN 2:13-17 "[Jesus] told those who sold the pigeons, 'Take these things away; do not make my Father's house a house of trade.' His disciples remembered that it was written, 'Zeal for your house will consume me'" (vv. 16-17).

Capemaum, a town in Galilee, was the home base of Jesus for much of His Galilean ministry (Matt. 4:43), and John 2:12 tells us that Jesus went to Capernaum after performing His first miracle in Cana. But He was not in Capernaum long before it was time for Passover, and being a faithful Jew, Jesus went up to Jerusalem to celebrate the feast according to the law’s prescriptions (John 2:13; see Deut. 16:1-8). Upon arriving and visiting the temple, our Lord found merchants selling animals and exchanging currency in the temple courts, and He drove them out (John 2:14-16).

Of course, this story of the cleansing of the temple is well known, and similar accounts occur in the Synoptic Gospels not at the beginning of Jesus’ ministry but toward its end (Matt. 21:12-13; Mark 11:15-17; Luke 19:45-46). Because of this, many commentators argue that John has moved the event, which actually took place at the end of Jesus’ ministry, to the beginning of Jesus’ ministry for theological purposes—to show how Jesus opposed the religious authorities in Jerusalem from the very start. While it is possible that John moved the record, it is more likely that Jesus actually cleansed the Jerusalem temple twice. Given the fallenness of human nature, it is easy to believe that the people would readily resume their sacrilege once Jesus was gone from the city, and John’s chronology is so tight in these opening chapters that it is difficult to conceive of His placing this event out of historical sequence.

But why did Jesus cleanse the temple? The animal sellers provided a service to worshipers, enabling them to travel the long journey to Jerusalem without having to haul the sacrificial animals with them. The moneychangers likewise served the people by enabling them to trade their currency for shekels, the only money in which the temple tax could be paid. These activities in themselves were not wrong; the problem was the locale in which they were conducted. They made worship impossible in the temple courts, for the ruckus of animals and commerce certainly is not conducive to a reverent atmosphere.

The scene prompted the disciples to recall Psalm 69: “Zeal for your house will consume me” (v. 9). In that psalm, David was opposed by those who disdained his respect for true worship and for the temple. The parallels with Jesus are clear, for He encountered opposition for His cleansing the temple (John 2:18-2 2). Like David, Jesus was opposed for being zealous for God and His worship.

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

Matthew Henry comments, "If God be our Father in heaven, and it be therefore our desire that his name may be sanctified, it cannot but be our grief to see it polluted." We should be grieved to see the church polluted by false worship and bad theology. And when we see such things, let us work to improve them, insofar as we are able.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Numbers 25
Psalm 119:139
Malachi 3:1-4
Mark 11:15-19

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Exodus 5-6
Matthew 17

(pg. 55)

---
THE TEMPLE OF JESUS’ BODY
WEDNESDAY 24

JOHN 2:18-22 "The Jews said to [Jesus], 'What sign do you show us for doing these things?' Jesus answered them, 'Destroy this temple, and in three days I will raise it up'" (vv. 18-19).

Moses received instructions for constructing the old covenant tabernacle from God Himself (Ex. 25-31). Later, King Solomon supervised the building of the temple in Jerusalem, and the temple was based on the basic design of the tabernacle that it replaced (2 Chron. 2-7). Given these realities, first-century Jews understood that any changes made to the temple required divine authority as mediated through the king of Israel. In other words, the ancient Jews believed that only the Messiah could do something like that which Jesus did when He cleansed the temple of animal sellers and moneychangers (John 2:13-17).

That explains why the Jews responded by asking Him for a sign (v. 18). They wanted proof that Jesus had the messianic authority to remove the merchants from the temple. Christ did not give them a sign immediately; instead, He gave an enigmatic response that they would destroy “this temple” and in three days He would raise it up (v. 19). Clearly, the Jewish opposition did not understand Jesus. (In fact, even the disciples did not get our Lord’s meaning at first because John 2:22 says that they did not understand Jesus’ saying until His resurrection.) The Jews thought Jesus was talking about the physical temple in Jerusalem, which had taken forty-six years to build (v. 20). In fact, the temple was not even really finished in Jesus’ day because work on it would continue off and on until AD 63, some thirty years after Jesus’ death and resurrection. But John inserts an explanatory comment in verse 21: the temple of which Jesus spoke was His own body. Thus, we see our Lord identifying Himself as the new and true temple. The old covenant sanctuary was going to be superseded by a new temple, even Jesus Himself, in whom His people are being knit together as a true sanctuary for God (1 Peter 2:4-50). Dr. R.C. Sproul writes in his commentary John, “Christ is the temple, and all men are commanded to come to Him in order to worship and serve the one true God.”

Finally, today’s passage is also important for our doctrine of the Trinity as it helps us see the principle of inseparable operations. The Father, Son, and Holy Spirit act inseparably; when God does something, all three persons are involved. We see this clearly in the resurrection of Jesus, which Scripture identifies as the work of Father, Son, and Holy Spirit. All three acted to raise Jesus from the dead (John 2:19-21; Rom. 8:11; Eph. 1:15-23).

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

Many Christians are eagerly expecting the day in which the physical temple in Jerusalem will be rebuilt. Today's passage, however, tells us that the only temple we should be looking forward to is the temple that is Christ's body, which we will see in the new heaven and earth. The temple pointed to Christ and it is fulfilled in Christ and His church, so let us love Christ and His people.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Exodus 20:3
Daniel 3
Mark 4:53-59
John 4:23-24

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Exodus 7-10
Matthew 18:1-20

(pg. 56.)

---
JESUS THE CHRIST
THURSDAY 25

MATTHEW 16:16 "Simon Peter replied, 'You are the Christ, the Son of the living God.'"

In John 1, Jesus is presented to us with a number of different names or titles. He is given the names Word, the Son, the Lamb of God, and several others, all of which help us better understand the nature of His mission. Indeed, the New Testament calls Jesus by many names, and the more we know about these names, the more we know about our Savior. We will now take a break from our study of John’s gospel in order to study some of these names and what they tell us about Jesus. Dr. R.C. Sproul’s teaching series The Names of Jesus will guide us.

The first name of Jesus we will consider is the name applied to Him more frequently than any other—Christ. So frequently does the title Christ appear that it can be easy to think that it is one of Jesus’ personal names, that His legal name was Jesus Christ just as the legal name of the first U.S. president was George Washington. However, although the New Testament often uses the name Christ as a stand-in for the name Jesus, the name Christ is really the title of an office. “Christ” is simply the English translation of the Greek word christos, which is itself the translation of the Hebrew term mashiach or “Messiah,” which means “anointed one.”

In one sense, the Bible identifies many individuals as anointed ones. Every prophet, priest, and king in Scripture is a “christ” in the sense of being anointed with oil and set apart for an office, for prophets, priests, and kings were all anointed for their ministries (see, for example, Ex. 29:9; 2 Sam. 5:1-3; 1 Kings 49). But over the course of the history of Israel, the people came to expect a final Anointed One who would be the ultimate fulfillment of the prophetic, priestly, and kingly offices. The Old Testament prophets, for instance, looked forward to the day when the monarchy would be restored to Israel and a righteous, anointed King would sit on the throne in Jerusalem once more (Amos 9:11-15). They foresaw the arrival of the King of Israel who would preach good news to the poor, release those in bondage, proclaim the year of the Lord’s favor, and usher in God’s judgment upon His enemies (Isa. 61:1-4).

Because prophets and priests were anointed as well as kings, the title Christ or Anointed One cannot be limited to the kingly role but also indicates that the final Christ would be a prophet and a priest as well. The New Testament fleshes this out, revealing Jesus as our true Prophet, Priest, and King (Heb. 1:1-4).

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

When we refer to Jesus as the Christ, we are saying that He is our all-sufficient Prophet, Priest, and King. We trust in Him alone because He speaks God's Word to us perfectly, provides final atonement for our sin, and leads us in righteousness against all His and our enemies. Yet, we remain prone to trust in lesser persons, so let us confess our failures to trust in Jesus alone and seek to rest in His grace and in Him only for all things.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Daniel 9:24-27
Psalm 2
John 12:1-8
Hebrews 9:11-14

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Exodus 11-12
Matthew 18:21-35

(pg. 57)

---
THE HIDDEN MESSIAH
FRIDAY 26

MATTHEW 16:20 "[Jesus] strictly charged the disciples to tell no one that he was the Christ."

Judah fell to the Babylonians in 586 BC, and from that moment on, the Jewish people longed for the day when they would be returned to their land and have a son of David ruling as king over them once more. God encouraged them in this hope, revealing to the prophets that He would restore the monarchy and set His people over the nations (Amos 9:11-15; Micah 4).

Although the Jews returned to their land in 538 BC as the result of the decree of King Cyrus of Persia (2 Chron. 36:22-23), they were still subject to the rule of other empires. Aside from a period of about fifty years, the Jews lived under the governance of Persia, then Greece, and then Rome. This only increased the longing of the people for independence and for a mighty king to deliver them from the occupying powers. By the first century AD, the Jews, living under Roman domination, were eager for the Anointed One, the Messiah, the King, to lead them against Rome and reestablish an earthly Jewish kingdom.

Certainly, the Old Testament picture of the Messiah includes the notion of a restored throne, culminating in the Messiah’s reign over all creation in a new heavens and earth (Isa. 66:15-24). But that is not all that the prophets say about the Messiah. Isaiah 53, for example, reveals that restoring the kingdom would not be accomplished without the sacrificial death of the Messiah on behalf of His people. Yet first-century Jews often overlooked the need for redemption from sin, focusing only on political salvation. Many individuals claimed to be the Messiah in the first century, and aware of these political aspirations, the Romans were quick to put down messianic claimants when they started making noise about being the promised King.

This may explain why Jesus frequently forbade His disciples from telling others that He was the Christ. It was not that He denied being the Messiah, for He affirmed Peter’s confession of Him as such (Matt. 16:13-19). Instead, He kept Peter and the other disciples from sharing this news widely because He knew the general Jewish populace was expecting a political form of salvation alone (v. 20). Perhaps broad-casting His messianic identity would have cut His ministry short, before its appointed time of completion, for the Romans were quick to squelch any potential Messiah and an uprising that people following the Messiah might instigate. Perhaps He kept His office as Messiah hidden from all but a few people so that He could accomplish the most important messianic work—atonement.
  
CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

People today continue to expect the Messiah to be something He is not. Many think He approves of their sin when He is set against it. Others believe He has come primarily to bring a political form of salvation. However, Jesus came first to save us from our sin, and He will not come as conquering King until He returns. Let us take care not to expect wrong things of our Messiah, Jesus the Christ.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
John 6:15
Revelation 19:11-21

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Exodus 13-15
Matthew 19:1-15

THE WEEKEND
Exodus 16-19
Matthew 19:16-30

(pg. 58)

---
WEEKEND DEVOTIONAL
JANUARY 27-28

SANCTIFIED CULTURE

REBECCA VANDOODEWAARD

At the seminary where my husband teaches, the annual “Culture Night” is one of my favorite evenings. With students from more than a dozen countries, it is a potluck like no other: South Indian curries, Dutch pastries, Kazakh barbecue, and Brazilian caramel crowd the tables. The student council designs the games to challenge everyone’s knowledge of others’ customs and histories. People know each other well, so we can laugh together at misconceptions, stereotypes, and our own blunders.

Each year we go with our children, and each time the evening teaches me. Yes, I learn things about other cultures (spicy kimchi pancakes are a thing). But I learn things about holiness, too.

When you have several Ethiopians in a school, the rest of the school learns a bit about Ethiopian culture—what makes someone Ethiopian in thought and action, not just skin color or height. Every culture has its weaknesses, its specific tendencies toward sin. But because of common grace, each has its strengths as well. And at a place where many of the students are maturing Christians, we have the privilege of seeing what a culture looks like as it is sanctified.

Someone once said that “culture is religion externalized and made explicit.” That is a profound thought. To a large extent, it is true. The way that people live and celebrate and worship is an outworking of what they believe about God and therefore themselves. But there are things about cultures—food, dress, and certain strengths—that remain unique, even in a community of believers. The beautiful thing about Christianity is that it does not neuter culture: it makes it holy. When the good news about salvation in Jesus works itself out in a community, cultural sins or weaknesses begin to die, and cultural strengths serve the new purpose of glorifying God and allowing Christians to enjoy their Maker.

At the culture night, I can look over at one table and see Brazilians laughing uproariously. Their extroverted culture is made holy as they serve and minister with genuineness, showing gentleness to people who are more reserved. The Malawian Christians retain their deep respect for authority while realizing that every believer needs accountability, and they must be willing to require it. I see South Koreans keeping their cultural formality while growing a passionate love for the church, striving to be all things to all men. And Americans? Well, I hope the Americans can recognize the incredible privileges of wealth, education, and freedom that we have; we can grow in humility, cheerfully serving with no public recognition.

For one evening each January, a couple dozen countries get together in a high school gym to celebrate culture. And there, under the snow in the dark, we can all see God working out His promise that every nation and tribe and tongue will surround the throne when the snow and the dark are no more.

REBECCA VANDOODEWAARD is an author and mother. She is author of Uprooted: A Guide for Homesick Christians and Reformation Women: Sixteenth-Century Figures Who Shaped Christianity’s Rebirth.

(pg. 59)

---
JESUS THE LORD
MONDAY 29

ACTS 2:36 "Let all the house of Israel therefore know for certain that God has made him both Lord and Christ, this Jesus whom you crucified."

Although the early Christians were a minority in the Roman Empire and often persecuted, they took pains to obey the laws of the land. That is what we learn from the writings of second-century Christians such as Justin Martyr, who was one of the first apologists (defenders of the faith). These early Christians paid their taxes, prayed for the emperor, and fulfilled their civic duties. There was one demand placed upon them, however, that they could not meet. When the authorities ordered them to say, “Caesar is Lord,” they refused. There was only one whom they would acknowledge as “Lord,” namely, the Lord Jesus Christ.

When we understand the meaning of the word Lord in Scripture as well as the claims of the Roman emperors, we will see why the early Christians referred to Jesus alone as Lord. “Lord” is the English translation of the Greek word kurios, which is typically used in the Septuagint, the ancient Greek translation of the Old Testament, to translate the Hebrew tetragrammaton—the covenant name of the God of Israel. That is, when the ancient Greek translators translated God’s name Yahweh, they typically did so using the Greek word kurios.

If kurios is used for the divine covenant name, then for the Jews to apply that title regularly to someone at least implies that they viewed the person who held the title as deity. Now, we must note that kurios in Scripture can be used of ordinary people, but its use for the divine name is striking, particularly when it is so frequently given to Jesus in the New Testament. The earliest Christians such as Peter and Paul were all Jews, yet they had no difficulty calling Jesus kurios, that is, “Lord” (Phil. 2:5-11; 1 Peter 1:3). In fact, the word kurios appears hundreds of times in the New Testament, and it is usually used for Jesus. This is an awfully strange phenomenon if the Apostles did not believe Jesus was God incarnate, for they could have used other titles for Him. The Apostles called Jesus “Lord” because they affirmed His deity (John 20:24-29).

The early church refused to use kurios for the Roman caesars because they were monotheists and would have no other God but the triune God of the Bible. Rome’s emperors often claimed to be deities, so for them to call for their subjects to call them “Lord” was for them to call for their subjects to worship them. The early Christians, rightly, could worship only the true kurios—Jesus Christ, the incarnation of the second person of the Trinity, Yahweh Himself in the flesh.
   
CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

When we call Jesus "Lord," we are saying many things. Chief among these is that He is our sovereign, and we owe Him alone absolute obedience. If we call Him "Lord" and yet do not want to keep His commandments, our confession of His lordship is spurious. Let us seek to obey His commandments today and to repent when we fall short of faithfulness.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Numbers 15:41
Jeremiah 9:23-24
2 Thessalonians 1:2
Jude 24-25

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Exodus 20-22
Matthew 20:1-16

(pg. 60)

---
30
type = article
author = Rothwell, Robert
title = Jesus The Son Of Man
journal = TableTalk
volume = 42
number = 1
pages = 61
date = January 2018
keywords = Rothwell Robert, Matthew 16.27, Son of Man

---
JESUS THE SON OF MAN
TUESDAY 30

MATTHEW 16:27 "For the Son of Man is going to come with his angels in the glory of his Father, and then he will repay each person according to what he has done."

Continuing our study of the names of Jesus, we begin today by noting that the two names we have looked at so far, Christ and Lord, are the names that the New Testament uses more than any other for our Savior. However, when we ask which name Jesus used for Himself more than any other, we find that it was neither Christ nor Lord. Instead, Jesus used the name Son of Man for Himself more than any other name. Son of Man is used as a title for Jesus eighty-two times in the New Testament, and all but three of these appear on the lips of Jesus Himself. Others refer to Jesus as the “Son of Man” only in Acts 7:56 and Revelation 1:13 and 14:14.

Given that Jesus so frequently referred to Himself as the “Son of Man,” it is worth taking the time to understand what He meant by that name or title. Many people who have never considered the issue before might think that the name is a reference to the humanity of Jesus. Scripture is clear that God the Son took on a true human nature in the incarnation and remains truly human and truly God (John 1:1-14). But the name Son of Man is no mere reference to Christ’s humanity. We get hints of that when Jesus speaks of the Son of Man coming on the clouds (Mark 13:26), which points us in the direction of the name’s having some kind of heavenly significance. And this is confirmed when we look in the Old Testament for the figure who is the Son of Man who comes on the clouds with authority to judge.

Daniel 7:9-44 speaks of “one like a son of man” who comes into the presence of the Ancient of Days—God Almighty—and receives a kingdom and authority over creation. The prophet’s vision is of the last days when this “one like a son of man” is enthroned over all. Given what the New Testament says about the ascension of Jesus and His enthronement as Lord over all (Acts 2:14-36), we understand that Jesus is the Son of Man prophesied in Daniel. Daniel saw a vision of Jesus returning to the Father for His coronation as King of kings and Lord of lords after the completion of His earthly ministry.

That is not all, however. Revelation 1:12-16 also reveals “one like a son of man,” and the description of Jesus in this passage has much in common with the description of the Ancient of Days in Daniel 7:9-40. We see, then, that although the Ancient of Days and the Son of Man can be distinguished, they also share the same attributes of glory and power. The name Son of Man, therefore, also points to the deity of Christ.

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

The background of the title Son of Man shows us how important it is to be conversant with the Old Testament. The Old Testament provides the necessary background for understanding the life and ministry of Jesus, so as our understanding of the Old Testament improves, so will our understanding of Christ.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Ezekiel 2
Mark 14:62
Luke 5:17-26
John 1:51

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Exodus 23-25
Matthew 20:17-34

---
Reference:

Bibliography:
Rothwell, Robert. "Jesus The Son Of Man." *TableTalk* 42, no. 1 (2018): 61.

Footnote:
Robert Rothwell, "Jesus The Son Of Man," *TableTalk* 42, no. 1 (2018): 61.

---
31
type = article
author = Rothwell, Robert
title = Jesus The Savior
journal = TABLETALK
volume = 42
number = 1
pages = 62
date = January 2018
keywords = Rothwell Robert,

---
JESUS THE SAVIOR
WEDNESDAY 31

ACTS 13:23 "Of this man's offspring God has brought to Israel a Savior, Jesus, as he promised."

When we find ourselves in distress, we are happy when someone rescues us. Whether it is as minor as having a tow truck save us from having to spend the night on the side of the road when our car breaks down or as significant as having a police officer rescue us from a criminal, we are glad when someone comes to help us. In times of hardship, we look for a savior.

One of the fundamental claims of the Christian faith is that Jesus is the Savior, and His name or title Savior is the subject of our study today. Today’s passage and many other New Testament texts identify Jesus as the Savior, and this name itself has a rich biblical background that can signify a number of different things. First, a savior can provide rescue in the sense of a military rescue from one’s enemies. Second Samuel 22 records David’s song of praise to God after he had been delivered from his many enemies. In verse 3, David refers to the Lord as “my savior” because God had saved him from being killed or captured in military operations throughout his life.

Salvation in Scripture can also involve being healed from an illness. Isaiah 38 records King Hezekiah of Judah’s illness and how God healed him when he asked the Lord to make him well. The Lord even added fifteen years to his life. After the healing, Hezekiah praises God for His mercy and for being the One who will save the king from his illness (v. 20).

Finally, salvation in Scripture can also mean being saved from sin. Ezekiel 37:23 looks forward to the day when the people of God would be saved from their sins and rescued from their backslidings into idolatry. God would cleanse them and restore them so that again He would be their God—that they would again serve only Him. Forgiveness of sins and the cleansing of people to make them holy is another way that Scripture talks about salvation. 

Throughout the history of Israel, God sent many saviors to His people to give them deliverance, particularly in the sense of a military rescue from their enemies. The judges of Israel, for example, delivered the Israelites from various oppressive regimes. In Jesus, however, we have the fulfillment of all of these aspects of salvation. He has saved us from our sins, and when He returns to bring the new heavens and earth, He will give us final salvation from all our enemies, including sickness and disease (Matt. 1:21; Rev. 21).

CORAM DEO
Living before the face of God

What kind of salvation are we searching for? We want to be delivered from oppression and hardship. We want to be healed of our diseases. It is not inherently wrong to desire such things, but more than anything else, we need salvation from our sin and the wrath of God. If Jesus is our Savior, we have assurance of this salvation, and we can look forward to the day when He will redeem us from all our other foes.

FOR FURTHER STUDY
Psalm 17:7
Isaiah 49:26
Titus 2:11-14
1 John 4:14

THE BIBLE IN A YEAR
Exodus 26-28
Matthew 21

---
Reference:

Bibliography:
Rothwell, Robert. "Jesus The Savior." *TableTalk* 42, no. 1 (2018): 62.

Footnote:
Robert Rothwell, "Jesus The Savior," *TableTalk* 42, no. 1 (2018): 62.

---
HEART AFLAME

False Humility

JOHN BLANCHARD

For those who would learn God’s ways, humility is the first thing, humility is the second, and humility is the third.” It has been more than r,600 years since Augustine wrote those words. They are counterintuitive in today’s world, where self-assertion is in our social DNA. Yet their truth was established long before Augustine, and God’s Word gives us clear directions on how to avoid false humility and to experience the real thing.

Take our regeneration. When we read that “of his own will” God “chose to give us birth” (James 1:18, NIV), there is no room for even a particle of pride. The fact that God “chose us in [Christ] before the foundation of the world” (Eph. 1:4) confirms that the miracle of regeneration has its genesis nowhere else but in the eternal will of God. Although we are “justified by faith” (Rom. 5:1), which we are responsible to exercise, we are told that this “is not your own doing; it is the gift of God” (Eph. 2:9). It is not the cause of our salvation, entitling us to take at least some credit for having believed; instead, it is the God-given means through which the righteousness of Christ is imputed to us. We are not saved for believing, but by believing, as God graciously enables us to take Him at His word.

True humility, rather than one that masks pride, should permeate our daily lives as Christians. With the ultimate economy of words, the Bible gets straight to the point: “Humble yourselves before the Lord, and he will exalt you” (James 4:10). If we were to do what this verse says, it would have a life-changing impact.

Two things need to be noted here. The first is that the verb “humble yourselves” is in the passive voice in the original Greek; its literal translation is “be humbled.” The truly humble person doesn’t join Charles Dickens’ Uriah Heep in boasting, “I am well aware that I am the ’umblest person going”; nor do they even think this might be true. If we try to give the impression of humility, we may be deceiving others, but we are certainly not deceiving God. Oswald Chambers was right to call conscious humility “the most Satanic type of pride.” False humility invites attention to itself; true humility is unconscious.

The second point is that “before the Lord” means having the Lord in mind as we go about daily life. King David was hardly a consistent paragon of virtue, yet he testified, “I have set the Lord always//pg. 64//before me” (Ps. 16:8). If we truly did this, it would revolutionize our lives at home, at work, at leisure, and in our church-based relationships, and it would have a profound effect on what we read, watch, think, and say.

The Bible’s promise that “he will exalt you” makes nonsense of our own pathetic appetite for appreciation, and it tells us that true humility is the key to receiving God’s favor: “One’s pride will bring him low, but he who is lowly in spirit will obtain honor” (Prov. 29:23). As G. Campbell Morgan neatly put it, “All God’s thrones are reached by going downstairs.”

A major area of life in which false humility can mask pride is in the exercise of our spiritual gifts. The Apostle Paul easily deflated “puffed-up” members of the early Corinthian church by asking two questions: “Who sees any-thing different in you? What do you have that you did not receive?” (1 Cor. 4:7). As Mat-thew Henry pointed out, “A sinner snatched from destruction by sovereign grace alone must be very absurd and inconsistent if proud of the free gifts of God.” It should only take a moment to see that answering Paul’s questions would be a great antidote to arrogance and a great help to humility. Pride of performance can often be hidden by a show of humility, a cloak deliberately designed to help others value our virtues. We repeat pious platitudes about giving God the glory but are not averse to receiving at least some of the praise. Yet true humility is fundamental to God-honoring ministry. Great men never think they are great, and small men never think they are small. A truly humble person is more jealous for God’s honor than his own.

One key pointer to genuine humility is this: “Have this mind among yourselves, which is yours in Christ Jesus” (Phil. 2:5). Jesus laid aside heaven’s glories, took on all the perils and pressures of humanity, and allowed Himself to be crucified. In all of this, He humbled Himself so that others might be exalted. As Alec Motyer point-ed out, “He recognized no limit to the extent to which his obedience in self-humbling must go.” Of course, the vicarious element in His sacrifice was unique, yet His followers are called to cultivate the mind that drove it on. True humility does not come by smugly ticking boxes but by inwardly cultivating the self-humbling mind that seeks only to serve others without either recognition or reward. Preaching recently in a church in Athens, I was struck by a notice in the minister’s office that displayed the words of the missionary Count Nicolaus von Zinzendorf: “Preach the gospel, die, and be forgotten.” In Matthew 2 5, Jesus taught that on the day of judgment, those welcomed into heaven will not even remember every time they had faithfully served the Lord.

Our Savior was “gentle and lowly in heart” (Matt. 11:29);true humility earnest-ly seeks to follow the example of the One who is “the founder and perfecter of our faith” (Heb. 12:2).

DR. JOHN BLANCHARD is an apologist and teacher. He is the director of Popular Christian Apologetics and author of more than thirty books, including Does God Believe in Atheists?, Ultimate Questions, and Truth for Life.

(pg. 65)

---
FOR THE CHURCH

Eating Together

DAVID CAMERA

I CAN STILL REMEMBER VIVIDLY that cold September Sunday. My wife and I had just arrived in London, where I was to do some further theological training. We found our way to a local church for corporate worship. Immediately after the service, a kind, elderly couple turned around and introduced themselves. Betrayed by our outrageous American accents, we were obviously from “out of town.” Almost without hesitation, this couple, whom we had met only moments before, invited us to have Sunday lunch at their home. What a glorious afternoon we had in a traditional English home. The meal was delicious, but it was the fellowship we shared as brothers and sisters in Christ that was truly satisfying.

One of the blessings we enjoy as Christians is that wherever we find ourselves in the world, we have a community to which we belong, where genuine relationships with other Christians can be enjoyed. If we neglect table fellowship, we will miss one of the wonderful ways God builds authentic community in the church, and we will sacrifice an opportunity to witness to the reality of the kingdom to the world.

As creatures made in God’s image, we were created for relationships, both with God and with other image bearers. By God’s design, therefore, genuine relationships are the basis for all human flourishing. We learn in the Bible that sharing a meal together is one of the primary ways relationships are established, deepened, and enjoyed both with God and with others. Think of the covenant meal the elders of Israel enjoyed with God on Mount Sinai. Moses records the spellbinding experience in Exodus 24:9-11:

*Then Moses and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel went up, and they saw the God of Israel.... And he did not lay his hand on the chief men of the people of Israel; they beheld God, and ate and drank.*

The Old Testament prophets often compared life in the new heavens and earth with the picture of a divine banqueting table (Isa. 25:6; 55:1-2). In the New Testament, we regularly find Jesus reclining “at table” during His earthly ministry, engaging with real people, furthering His kingdom work, fostering true community, demonstrating reconciliation with God, and building genuine fellowship among His disciples (Luke 5:29; 7:36; 11:37; 14:15). Of course, Jesus calls us to gather around His table where we enjoy fellowship with Him and with our brothers and sisters//pg. 66//by virtue of the Holy Spirit who indwells us (Luke 22:19-20; 1 Cor. 10:15-17). The early church gathered regularly in homes to “break bread together” as a practical expression of their fellowship in Christ (Acts 2:46). The Apostles exhort us to show hospitality (Rom. 12:13; Heb. 13:2; 1 Peter 4:9). Finally, our eternal, joyous, soul-satisfying communion with God and our brothers and sisters in Christ is depicted as the great marriage supper of the Lamb (Rev. 9:6-10). Eating together is important.

Christians have al-ways enjoyed sharing a meal because of the rich biblical symbolism; because it is a tangible expression of service, love, and unity; and because of the opportunity it affords for true fellowship and genuine community. Practically, sharing a meal nourish-es our need to know and be known because it facilitates face-to-face conversation.

In our digitally connected world, we share a tremendous amount of information through texts, e-mails, and tweets; however, because a significant amount of communication is nonverbal, precious little communication actually occurs digitally. Seeing someone’s facial expression, hearing the tone of his voice, and looking into his eyes are all vital elements of real communication. Ideally, sharing a meal would put us face-to-face with real people. But I am sure you have witnessed this scene: people out together at a restaurant, sitting at the same table, interacting not with each other but with their phones. It reminds me of the film WALL-E, in which the remnant of the human race is hurtling through space on a rocket ship. On the ship, everyone has his own digital recliner that hovers above the floor. Each recliner has its own screen that delivers hypnotic doses of information. The result is that people never talk to one another or interact with their environment. Because they never have to walk, their muscles have atrophied, and because they never have to think, they are easily manipulated. The point is clear: technology can become dehumanizing. It is therefore vital that we emphasize the importance of living in personal relationships within the church.

Tragically, in our modem, Western culture, authentic communication and real relationships are in decline. Sadly, nuclear families rarely eat together today; how much less do we invite others to our homes? In a world where we are growing more divided and isolated, one of the tangible, compelling, and attractive distinctive of the church will be our authentic relationships and loving community. Christians will be people who actually talk to one another face-to-face (2 John 12). Sharing a meal will be an “otherworldly” experience to our otherwise fractured, depersonalized, and hyperindividualized world, and therefore a tremendous witness to the reality of Christ’s kingdom. We have to invite our friends and neighbors to come out into the light of unfiltered relationship both with God and with others. Without such relationships, human flourishing is impossible.

I encourage you to extend an invitation today and begin to develop the kind of rich relationships we were designed to enjoy at our tables. Want to come over for dinner?

REV. DAVID CAMERA is senior pastor of River Oaks Church (PCA) in Lake Mary, Fla.

(pg. 67)
       
---
CITY ON A HILL

Good Works as a Light to the World

JON BLOOM

I wonder if I would have passed my ordination exams had Jesus been sitting on that council of examiners. Some-thing tells me I got off too easy. That some-thing is Matthew 5:r4-16:

*You are the light of the world. A city set on a hill cannot be hidden. Nor do people light a lamp and put it under a basket, but on a stand, and it gives light to all in the house. In the same way, let your light shine before others, so that they may see your good works and give glory to your Father who is in heaven.*

It’s not that the brothers who examined me pitched me softballs. They grilled me with difficult and complex questions. They required me to give clear evidence that my theological understanding was sound. I remember a few questions exposing things I needed to firm up.

But I was not asked pointed questions about how my sound theological under-standing was producing the shining light of good works. I was not required to give clear evidence that I was living like a city set on a hill. No doubt my brother examin-ers were gracious in giving me the benefit of the doubt.

But I don’t think Jesus would have been as easily satisfied. I think He would have pressed me harder to demonstrate that my theological knowledge was in fact fueling the burning of my visible lamp. He might have asked me to describe how all in the “house” of my neighborhood and relational networks were tangibly receiving the benefit of my “light.” He might have required specific examples of the last time I was reviled and persecuted on His account (Matt. 5:11-12). He might have asked me when I was last aware of someone giving glory to my Father in heaven after seeing my good works.

I would have found those questions much harder to answer. They would have exposed even more and, I daresay, more important things that needed firming up.

There is no abstract truth more beautiful to the regenerated human soul than the light of the knowledge of the glory of God in the face of Jesus Christ (2 Cor. 4:6). Jesus really is the light of the world (John 8:12). His word is a lamp to our feet (Ps. 119:105), and in His light we see light (36:9). It is altogether beautiful and wonderful to understand.

But we only truly understand it if our knowledge is living and active inside us//pg. 70//so that it governs how we live—if the love of Christ truly controls us (2 Cor. 5:14). And living our understanding is much more difficult, demanding, humbling, and costly than being able to clearly articulate it. As Christians, we are called not to be mere theoreticians but practitioners. Jesus called Himself the light of the world, and He also called us the light of the world.

What made Jesus the light of the world? It was not His mere words, but also His works: “The works that I do in my Father's name bear witness about me”
(John 10:25). Jesus’ works made it manifestly clear who He is. His works shone and still shine.

What makes us as Christians the light of the world? It is not our mere words, but also our works. The works we do in Jesus’ name bear witness about us. Our outward, observable, public works make who we are and whose we are manifestly clear. And just as it was for Jesus, our works will cause some to revile us and persecute us and utter all kinds of evil against us falsely on His account, and they will cause others to give glory to our heavenly Father.

What kind of good works shine like lights? This is not a difficult question to answer. It’s that the answer has demanding implications. We just need to think for a moment: What good works have others done that stand out most in our memory? Who are the people who have been most radiant with Jesus’ light? They very well may not have possessed the most prominent talents or most publicly influential platforms. But they are the people we have likely found ourselves simultaneously drawn to and unnerved by. That’s because the light of their humble love both warms our chilled hearts and exposes our selfishness and pride.

The shining people are those whose servant-hearted and sacrificial love make them literally remarkable. People talk about them. Some slander them, and others praise them. But they are ones who find God’s steadfast love better than life (Ps. 63:3), and they love others in both word and deed (1 John 3:18). Their words and deeds are sometimes tender and sometimes tough, depending on the need, because they really consider others more significant than themselves (Phil. 2:3), and their aim is to love others, not to gain others’ approval. It’s not merely what they do but why they do it and the way they do it.

If God grants me the average life expectancy of an American male, I have one-third of my life left to live. And I am asking Jesus to press me harder than ever before, to examine me fully, to search me and try me and transform me—because I want to shine more with the light of Jesus than I ever have. I don’t want merely to articulate glorious truth more accurately, but to manifest it more fully. I want to live it and to so love God and others for His sake that, whether I provoke persecution or the praise of God, my light, my city on a hill, is clearly seen.

And you? Join me! Let us press on to know the Lord (Hos. 6:3) and let our knowledge pour out in love through our mouths and hands and feet and wallets and schedules.

Let us let our light shine.

JON BLOOM is co-founder and board chair of Desiring God He is author of Things Not Seen and Don’t Follow Your Heart.

(pg. 71)

---
LAST THINGS

The Apocryphal and Deuterocanonical Books

GREG SALAZAR

THE VALUE AND CANONICAL STATUS of the deuterocanonical books or Apocrypha (literally meaning “things that are hidden”) has been a point
of significant contention between Protestants and Roman Catholics since the time of the Reformation. According to Bruce Metzger, the word deuterocanonical was a term coined in T566 by the Roman Catholic Sixtus of Sienna. It was used to distinguish between the two different kinds of books whose authority the Roman Catholic Church recognized, the “protocanonical” (those received from the church’s inception) and the “deuterocanonical” (those acknowledged later in church history). The latter group consists of twelve books:

	* Tobit
	* Judith
	* The Additions to the Book of Esther (added to the book of Esther in Roman Catholic Bibles)
	* The Wisdom of Solomon
	* Ecclesiasticus (or the Wisdom of Jesus the Son of Sirach)
	* Baruch
	* The Letter of Jeremiah (added to the book of Baruch in Roman Catholic Bibles)
	* The Prayer of Azariah and the Song of the Three Young Men (added to the book of Daniel in Roman Catholic Bibles)
	* Susanna (added to the book of Dan-iel in Roman Catholic Bibles)
	* Bel and the Dragon (added to the book of Daniel in Roman Catholic Bibles)
	* 1 and 2 Maccabees

In addition to these deutercanonical books, the Eastern Orthodox Church generally recognizes three other books in its Old Testament: 1 and 2 Esdras and the Prayer of Manasseh. Collectively, these fifteen extra books not found in the Hebrew or Protestant canon are also known as the Apocrypha.


These books (with the exception of 2 Esdras) were part of the Greek translation of the Hebrew Bible known as the Septuagint; however, none of the books of the Apocrypha were in the original Hebrew canon. Although Roman Catholics and the Eastern Orthodox contend that these books are part of the canon of Scripture, Protestants have consistently argued that although the books of the Apocrypha have historical value, these books should not be recognized as canonical.//pg. 72//This article will give an overview of the content of these books and the various Protestant positions on their value, while also explaining why Protestants have not received these writings as inspired by God.

The value of these books lies in the fact that because they are some of the earliest interpretations of the Hebrew Bible, they give us some insight into how the Old Testament may have been understood by first-century readers. These books provide many details pertaining to the roughly four hundred years from the date when the last book of the Old Testament (Malachi) was written to the time of Christ. They give us insight into the cultural, political, and ideological background in the years before Jesus’ birth, which can aid our understanding of the New Testament. For example, 1 and 2 Maccabees provide an account of the Jewish revolt in the second century BC against the Syrian persecutor Antiochus IV Epiphanes, and they contain a mixture of historical and legendary material. And 1 Esdras endeavors to provide an alternate and independent account of 2 Chronicles 35-36, Ezra, and Nehemiah 7:38-8:12. The books of the Apocrypha are not merely of the historical genre, but also novelistic (Tobit, Judith, Susanna, and Bel and the Dragon), didactic (the Wisdom of Solomon and Ecclesiasticus), devotional (the Prayer of Manasseh), liturgical (the Prayer of Azariah and the Song of the Three Young Men), epistolary (the Letter of Jeremiah), and apocalyptic (2 Esdras).

Many Protestants have attested to the value of the deuterocanonical books and the Apocrypha. For example, the title of these books in Luther’s 1534 German translation of the Bible reads, “Apocrypha, that is, books which are not held equal to the sacred Scriptures, and nevertheless are use-ful and good to read.” The title of these books in one of the very first English translations of the Bible by Matthew Coverdale likewise says, “Apocrypha: The books and treatises which among the fathers of old are not reckoned to be of like authority with the other books of the Bible, neither are they found in the Canon of the Hebrew.” Speaking of the Apocrypha, article 6 of the Belgic Confession says, “The Church may read and take instruction from [the Apocrypha], so far as they agree with the canonical books.” Similarly, article 6 of the//pg. 73//Thirty-Nine Articles of the Church of England says, “And the other books (as Jerome saith) the Church both read for example of life, and instruction of manners; but yet doth it not apply them to establish any doc-trine.” These sixteenth-century Protestant testimonies, along with the fact that the Apocrypha was included in the King James Version and all the sixteenth-century English translations, attest to the reality that Protestants have historically recognized the usefulness of reading the Apocrypha.

Nevertheless, although Protestants have recognized the value of reading these books, they have not received these writings as in-spired by God for at least two reasons. First, the New Testament writers did not recognize the Apocrypha as Scripture. For example, while the New Testament quotes the Old Testament as Scripture roughly three hundred times, the New Testament books never quote the Apocrypha as Scripture. Therefore, Protestants stand with the New Testament writers in affirming that only those books that were in the original Hebrew canon have canonical authority. (Some scholars high-light that there are occasional allusions to the Apocrypha and even other noncanonical books known as the Pseudepigrapha in some New Testament books. However, these are never spoken of as Scripture or as inspired as the Old Testament books are.)

Second, throughout the history of the Christian church, and especially since the Reformation, there has been a consistent testimony that the deuterocanonical books are not inspired by God and therefore should be distinguished from the rest of the can-on of Scripture. For example, the Puritan divines who composed the Westminster Confession of Faith said, “The books com-monly called Apocrypha, not being of divine inspiration, are no part of the Canon of Scripture, and therefore are of no authority in the church of God, nor to be otherwise approved, or made use of, than other hu-man writings” (WCF 1.3). Likewise, article 6 of the Belgic Confession says, “We distinguish those sacred books [the Protestant canon] from the apocryphal” since “they are far from having such power and efficacy that we may from their testimony confirm any point of faith or of the Christian religion; much less may they be used to detract from the authority of the other, that is, the sacred books.” Calvin also argued that by “admitting all the Books promiscuously into the Canon,” Roman Catholics have done this “against the consent of the primitive Church,” since these writings were “called by the Fathers not canonical but ecclesiastical books, which might in-deed be read to the people, but were not entitled to establish doctrine.”

Indeed, it was not until the Council of Trent decreed in April 1546 that the Roman Catholic Church’s canon of the Old Testament should contain the Apocrypha—with the exception of the Prayer of Manasseh and r and 2 Esdras. This decree also condemned anyone who did not “accept these entire books, with all their parts, as they have customarily been read in the Roman Catholic Church and are found in the ancient editions of the Latin Vulgate, as sacred and canonical.” As Calvin famously said, “The spirit of Trent wished, by this decree, that Scripture should only signify to us whatever dreaming monks might choose.”

However, some have highlighted that a number of church fathers, including Irenaeus, Tertullian, Clement of Alexandra, and Cyprian, quoted regularly from the books of the Apocrypha and regarded them as inspired Scripture. Although these fa-thers did regard these books as Scripture, one contributing factor is that they did not read Hebrew, and therefore followed the//pg. 74//Septuagint, which bound the books of the Apocrypha alongside the Greek translation of the Hebrew Scriptures. Moreover, when Jerome was commissioned by Pope Damasus I to produce the Latin Vulgate in the fourth century, he deliberately separated the Hebrew canon from the Apocrypha, placing several of the latter in an appendix with a prefatory explanation for why they were not part of the canon. Despite the con-cem of Jerome and subsequent copyists to preserve these distinctions, some throughout church history, especially during the medieval period, still regarded these books as inspired Scripture. Yet many others before the Reformation, including Justin Martyr, Gregory the Great, and John Wycliffe, maintained the distinction between these books and canonical books. The fact that pre-Reformation divines had given canonical status to books excluded from the Hebrew canon is a further testimony to the need of the medieval church for a Reformation ad fan tes (back to the sources).

Protestants have also pointed out that the Roman Catholic Church uses the deuterocanonical books to support doctrinal and theological points, including the doctrines of purgatory and praying for the dead, that are affirmed nowhere in the traditional Hebrew Scriptures and New Testament. In short, during the Reformation, debates over doctrine were integrally tied to the debates about which books were authoritative. Not only did the Protestants affirm that Scripture alone is the ultimate authority in faith and practice, but they were zealous to preserve the integrity of the canon, only recognizing the authority of those books affirmed throughout the history of the Christian church. While this reality should not deter us from reading the Apocrypha for insight about the back-ground of the New Testament, it should caution us to ensure that our doctrine and practice is based on sola Scriptura.

*This article draws heavily on the content in Bruce Metzger, “Preface” and “Introduction to the Apocrypha,” in Herbert G. May and Bruce M. Metzger, eds., The Oxford Annotated Bible with the Apocrypha, Revised Standard Version (Oxford, England: Oxford University Press, 1965), vii-xxiii.

GREG SALAZAR is assistant professor of historical theology at Puritan Reformed Theological Seminary in Grand Rapids, Mich., and a Ph.D. candidate at the University of Cambridge. 

(pg. 75)




